[Daily Discussion] Friday, May 18, 2018 -- TITLE
#New post: [\[Daily Discussion\] Saturday, May 19, 2018 →](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8kiwgl/daily_discussion_saturday_may_19_2018/)
To those calling a bear trap, 24hs ago we were @8350, dumped to 7925, retraced 23%. Even if we retrace to 38 or 50%, in which world is this a bear trap?
Definitely a no trade zone for me.

8k seems to be an awkward number. Bring it to 7.8k or 8.2k so we can see if the bulls or bears are serious.

Floating around 8k just isn’t appetizing for a position 
I believe Bitcoin_Schmitcoin was one of the first on Twitter to identify price action of the past three months as possible accumulation, on a macro scale, here: [thread](https://twitter.com/BTC_Schmitcoin/status/980482770609819651)

Compare the Ebay reference chart with the Bitcoin chart. It's holding up very well so far. Comparison between the two:

[Bitcoin](https://www.tradingview.com/x/4xcmTnvK/) and [Ebay](https://www.dropbox.com/s/ix8gsqff7lbip45/ebay.jpg).

I'm staying out of any significant positions until there's more clarity on what'll happen around the bottom of the TR, or the bottom of the large triangle we're in. (*if* we indeed go down that far)


BTC continues to ladder down at set intervals, exactly as its done since 5/4:

https://www.tradingview.com/x/1wBNRe9a/

Even if we can't know when a Bart occurs, we can easily see how high up a potential bart will be when it happens. We can also see the expected range while we are on the current rung, since we tend to only move up one rung at a time. Overreaction by sellers can be seen with the blue indicators, 11-12th having temporally oversold.

Outlook: Further selloffs for the foreseeable future till we exit this channel. 8.3K is a possible high, but nothing over that is likely.

---

ETH on the other hand, has had a much wider ladder than BTC. It hasn't wanted to go down. I assume ETH sellers are in denial about ETH also needing to correct downward. Yesterday was an interesting point, because it was at the end of its range:

https://www.tradingview.com/x/fVkmqliy/

As you can see, it dumped, and dumped harder than BTC in order to stay within its ladder range: 4.8% drop btc, 7.2% eth. This corrected the range so its now in the middle area instead of end of the ladder, giving it a bit more room to rise today.

If the pattern holds true, ETH has to dump again ***today***, which means BTC will too (sometimes we get several days before a drop)
There's still a ways to go before the market makes it there, but now that the market is back above $8,200 I can only assume the target for this move up is the resistance line starting with the $10,000 high:

https://imgur.com/a/ZkW45oG

I'll be longing a break above the line and shorting another failure. 

As for anyone concerned about my mental or emotional wellbeing, trust me, I'm fine. 
About to be unavailable for trades for the rest of the day and only able to check in once or twice tomorrow, so I am closing my long. Original target was 8335 but hitting eths resistance and thinking we're about to go down into the 7s by Sunday so I'll take profit happily.

!long xbtusd close 8245
Pretty surprised to see price back above $8,100 so quickly.

I'm pretty skeptical that this will continue to move up, but I'm still holding my long for now.

I'll close it around break even if it drops below $8,000 again.
This feels like it's time for a proper bounce, but I'm not closing my short just yet.  I am prepared to take repeated small losses on short positions until there is proof that this current bear move is over for awhile.  Of course there haven't been many losses like that in the past few weeks, but I realize it will change eventually.
[deleted]
This bounce hit my upside target area and my limit order for a new short was filled...we'll see how this plays out. Good luck out there

peace
I think a change of strategy seems necessary for me. I'm about at the same place profit wise as I was at the start of the week. I've been hesitant to take profits expecting a continuation of the short term trend. But that's just not happening in this chop/bart market. I think I might try to have a more of a scalper mentality and try to close my winners as soon as we stall in either movement, or at least take 50% profit. I've had very lucrative paper profits several times, a few break even trades and a couple of times gotten wicked out of a decent position. Like last night's short from 8200.

With that said, !short xbtusd 8070 10X 100%

[4H just looks bearish](https://www.tradingview.com/x/0dH41Ibk/). RSI cooled off and there doesn't seem to be follow through or buying pressure at this price.

Still hodling my short from 8225...I was expecting a pump but thought it wouldn't go past 8235

If we go above the high we just made at 8275ish I will close it

peace  
I dont know if it is relevant for crypto but the new coalition from Italy decided to stop the  austerity budget, menaing they take new loans. The EUR decreased in value because of that. It could increase the debt\-free crypto attention. 
Bailed on my long for tuna sub profits and reopened short up around 8280 on June futures. Will update the bot when I get home 
Short $1mm @ $8222, expecting this mini tether rally to run out of steam soon. May add to this position. 

!short XBTUSD 8222 10X 5%
LOL holy ever-loving hell. 
So the price action seems to be pretty boring. Nothing to talk about there, I get that, but..
I’ve just started catching up on the past 2 DD’s and it’s just major drama; followed by apologizing, followed by drunken ranting, and then there’s some plastered guy with erectile difficulty attempting to bang his girlfriend while watching the Bitcoin price chart(?!) Then yet more fighting and apologizing wtf. This is some funny shit.  

Somebody fill me in. Where are the mods. Why is this trading sub turning into /r/menstrualcycle  
I think the 618 fib [might just hold](https://snag.gy/simNf0.jpg) and with the bull divs showing up I think we're headed for a test of 8.4
just got a text from cryptowatch saying btc fell to 9150. Apparently some old texts got delayed  

Thanks for the panic attack ya piece of shit 
What's this, a LGD for ants?
A note of caution:
In the past when positions have barted up around a small range of only 50 to 100 instead of the 300 dollar moves, folks became complacent and placed bets to scalp these and were profitable for a while.
Then they got wiped out a with a big move.
Just a friendly reminder to zoom out before you place a trade!
My long was always intended to be a scalp, since I opened on swaps, but yeah, I could be. I've flipped positions 4 times and came out break-even or in profit on all of them, which is rather surprising in hindsight. They weren't frenetic moves--they were intentional with reason, but still. More than I'm comfortable doing routinely. Taking the night off and sleeping in an unleveraged position sounds like my best course. Market will be here tomorrow. 

Edit: this was not supposed to be top level. It was a reply to /u/citral23

Sorry.
So as this forum slips into a day-trade, bart metaphor driven, synthetic phallus pattern finding mode, I find myself needing to step back and make a more macro evaluation.

We are currently in the correction phase of what most classify as the 3rd bubble in bitcoin (this first bubble happening in the teens and the data being quite old). The previous bubble took the price to 1000 and corrected it down to around 150 from where it slowly climbed back up to around 20k inciting calls for infinite parabolas and wagers involving unsavory self-amputation culinary adventures.

Most should agree that the ICO wild-west gold rush fueled much of this pump, Btc and other major crypto's being the entry points to join the quest for the el-dorado. New as it was in old, the ones selling the shovels got rich off the ones digging the holes. In the end, few were left holding nuggets, most found their pockets lined with pyrite, some still call themselves rich even though they have not attempted to cash out the contents of said pockets.

This correction was inevitable for crypto as a whole, so obviously it would effect BTC regardless of how good or bad its fundamentals might be. Regulation is turning out quite open but it doesn't matter, countries are experimenting with crypto but it doesn't matter, solutions are live for scalability but it doesn't matter, institutional investors have crypto exposure but that doesn't matter.

What does matter is that there is uncertainty for the future. The best sovereign storage of value solution means little is the volatility of the value it hold can swing 90% in a few months. Steam backed out from bitcoin payments for the same reason. The reality of tax obligations corrodes the notion of absolute sovereign control. 

There are plenty of valid reason market actors can (and should) be weary of bitcoin and crypto, even more of other newcomer coins.

Yet I am still bullish long term. A corresponding correction to 2014 would make the price wick down to the 3000$ area, at which point the supply of bitcoin would be severely hit with massive miner operations cost restructurings. I see very little need for market agents to wait for retesting the 1k top to reenter accumulation. There is massive amount of demand waiting on the sidelines for bitcoin with the highly correlated nature of legacy markets today, portfolio managers are desperate for a low correlation asset, they just want a good deal for it, they wont buy the top like a fool buying the prospect for a used up gold mine.

I have no doubt BTC will revisit and surpass 20k in the next two years but before that happens three main events need to happen:

* The ICO/shitcoin space needs a purging event. 95% of newcoins need to go to 0. Its the only way to restore the other 5% as non-ponzi legit investments.

* The price action needs a long accumulation phase. Given the size of institutional investors and the current low market liquidity I would estimate at least 3 times the previous one during 2016, making it likely over a year of range trading, likely around the 4k-6k area. Nothing wrong with 6k-8k either.

* A catalyst event will be needed to regain the public trust. That may come in unpredictable forms like a government collapse, a large supply-demand chain developing a copyable crypto-based clearing house, affordable retail-investor exchanges coming into play...

Meanwhile I understand the bearish sentiment, but the recurring off-the-cuff questioning of bitcoin fundamentals and its equating to ponzi schemes is just silly. Fundamentally BTC is at one of its strongest points ever, its simply too expensive right now for the corresponding demand. Do not pass the opportunity to take advantage of the discounts of the next few years. Its very likely the last one you will get.
Just woke up to find my long from last night isn't underwater yet. Is this real life or bear-trappy?
Is this looking like another bear flag on the hourly?
In an era of "Decentralization" & smart contracts that cut out the middle man isn't it funny how Bitmex et al can so easily gouge it's customer base.  Someone comes up with any type of inverse coin software development these exchanges are toast. Even develop some D app smart contract margin borrow escrow system- they could make a fortune. Could still escrow & have margin calls to protect lenders but rates could be reduced imho. 
Went long at 8110, will take half as profit if we reach 8350, letting the rest ride.

I made a bit of technical analysis. I don't usually do this but I hope you guys can find it insightful or helpful in some way.


____


I think we're going to go up from here. We've hit the bottom bollinger band on the 1d, and every time we have done that, we've gone up for about 2 or 3 days (or longer). 


Chart: https://www.tradingview.com/x/3C5K9a1Q/



____


In addition to that, we have a bullish divergence on the 4h charts. Price is making a lower low and the RSI has made a higher low.


Chart: https://www.tradingview.com/x/JBGnjwiG/


____

We have also double bottomed on the Stochastic RSI on the 1d charts. Usually we get a movement upward when that happens.


____


The next Fib retracement level from the low at 6400 to the high at 9900 is the 61.8% level which is at 7800. So it's possible we wick down there and then start moving up.


Chart: https://www.tradingview.com/x/2c0YeUzF/



**However**: I am not experienced using Fibonacci retracement levels so if I am somehow using them wrong, please let me know.

____


We are also touching the bottom of the 1d ichi cloud, and if I am correct, that serves as support, but don't quote me on that.


Chart: https://www.tradingview.com/x/mJGBiWdq/


____



As I said before, I don't tend to write these up and I'm basically as amateur as you can get when it comes to trading. Please give me your thoughts on what you think.
LOL at the change of sentiment
this is getting a little wickdiculous 
30 minutes ago 200 millions tether usd moved from tether treasury wallet into bitfinex wallet.
Closed my long at 8050 I said, no buying power I said.

FFS.
Still holding my short from 8260 (June futs) for the moment, but the buying pressure is holding on for now. I believe we're in a descending channel that got broken yesterday primarily due to the BitMEX outage, which we've jumped back into. We've formed a bear flag inside it, but if the outage was an anomaly, then the flag may not be valid. Either way, a trip to 8200 should invalidate most all of this, and I'll be looking to get out if we break and hold that.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/KWqtKP3a/

Either way, I'm holding short for now. I may take some profit on it if we dip back here so I can move my stops higher to a more comfortable range and still break-even on the trade.

edit: nevermind, closed my short now with this spike + tether data.

edit 2: flipped short. setting stops stupid tight under 8170 in case this is dumps immediately.
Well I can finally breathe a sigh of relief. Around this time yesterday my 5x long (100% of trading stack) was 5% underwater. Had my stop triggered (just under $7,800) I would've wiped out all profits from the last month. Now the question is to close at B/E or let it ride a bit longer?
I doubt any real breakout can happen on the weekend. Typically volume is low on the weekend and dips are expected. But if this level holds, I'm pretty sure next week we'll have some interesting price movement. Everyone have a nice weekend and enjoy.
Chad permabulls vs Virgin panic sellers
Anyone expecting a similar trajectory?

https://www.tradingview.com/chart/BTCUSD/cNdgZZOq-11788-double-top-crash-VS-9990-crash/

(Shameless self-posting)
If the pattern continues and we bart down my target is just above 8000...otherwise i will be stopped out eventually and take the night off !

Good luck to all

Peace
I even bought some 9.5k up-contracts which expire in a couple hours. Let's see if we reach it :D
BitMEX is still not working right.  I placed a couple of market orders and didn't show up until a few minutes later.  So be careful there.
I don't know much about BBands, but on the half hour, they're necked in pretty tight.
I'm a TA noob but that's a bullish divergence on the 4hr right? Why is nobody in this thread talking about it, has it not been confirmed or is it just not that strong of an indicator?

I'm still bearish mid-term but I think we should bounce here at least to the downtrend line from 10k, but I think we could double top at 10k and I would still be bearish mid-term.
https://www.tradingview.com/x/Zce1yZOJ/

To all the underwater short guys: really sorry, it was my fault. First time for a longer time i went with a big short, suddenly 2x200mio of tether are pumped. Last time i tried with a big long, suddenly a korean exchange gets raided. 
Hold your butts!  Tether 250M pump on the way!

https://omniexplorer.info/address/3MbYQMMmSkC3AgWkj9FMo5LsPTW1zBTwXL
this market was trying to teach everybody to stop trading I think... hope ya held! 

*plz god*
Sitting nice and comfy with my 7980 long I opened last night. Added more to it at 8050. Stop Loss still at 7690. I’m expecting positive movement with lots of volatility today after the sell off the last few days. If you have a position, make a plan & stick with it. 
You need to relax, it is just a stophunt and not a reversal. If you FOMO back in, you are a noob.

We can go even higher but don't be sad if we drop lower.
Closed my long at around $8,090. 

Opened a short at the same price point.

Stops above $8,300.

EDIT: Buyers have had all morning to follow-through on this bounce and can't be bothered. Selling pressure will take over sooner rather than later if there isn't a strong push above $8,200.
WE LOVE TETHER RIGHT DONT WE FOLKS? 
Closed my short at $8,214 for a small loss. 

EDIT: Bitmex futures are rising disproportionate to spot. Not exactly my ideal scenario for continuing to hold a losing position.


10x short @8225

edit : if it goes any higher than 8320 I will bail
people who call for 3k are just as delusional as the bulls calling for 20k. We only touched 3k for an hour in OCTOBER when the crypto market was a lot smaller and it was going under extreme China FUD. 
I am out of the position right now. Thinking about putting ladder shorts on anything above 8,200 and putting ladder longs on anything below 7,900. I expect us to fight between 7,700 and 8,400 for a while now...
Closed my averaged 8020 long at 8115 for a small profit. I was expecting a FOMO bounce into 8200-8300 range. I’ll open a new long if we can break 8200
Zoomed out perspective \(1D chart BFX\): Do you watch similar lines and channels on longer timeframes? Could point towards a $6.9k bottom around May 27 unless the current downward channel breaks to the upside \(resistance right now around $8.5k but falling rapidly\)...

[https://imgur.com/a/omn89t8](https://imgur.com/a/omn89t8)
Quick question. How do I get the drawing tools up on tradeview (mobile). 
I'm sure I'm missing something super obvious as I just started with tradeview.
Thanks.
Is something broke or did volume literally fall off a cliff about an HR ago? Looking at volume on 5min bfx charts. Literally looks like one buyer doing a lot of work for about 15 candles then suddenly stopping. 
Can't go to sleep because I can't decide where to put my stops. I have a relatively large 10x long from 8,040 avg entry.

I feel like I should really lock in some profits, as my profits currently account for 5% of my margin balance, but I've been stopped out in bad spots a lot recently by random wicks. I think I've forgotten how to be objective.

Edit: stops at 8,185 for now while I go make a coffee. Im sure I'll move them the second I return to my desk.

Edit2: Well, now I have no position to keep me awake, but I'm drinking a coffee so probably won't sleep anyway.
Resistance turned support?

Not sure how much weight that line had(has) in the first place though. 

https://www.tradingview.com/x/jo0Id0BP/
so earlier today I called the beartrap and got downvoted for it, despite having good arguments. I membah when bulls used to do that in december towards bears. Funny how the tables have turned, and probably the same people downvoting anyway. 
https://www.tradingview.com/x/SGzFrS9i/

Don't add to a losing position, don't cling to hope. Instead cut your gainz/losses. And reform a new trading hypothesis. I waited almost 2 weeks before longing today, i got shaken out of my 9.9 short and closed prematurely at 9.6. There's nothing wrong with taking emotional distance from the action and revising your skills right.

IMO this was leg 1/3. 
https://www.tradingview.com/x/arkZzcRV/
Volume profile suggesting 8.3, 8888 & 9.3 as  resistances. Keep in mind: this sidewayz was prolly was the long re-entry before the next leg. Good luck yall. And enjoy the 10k rally. 
whales spoofing as good as they can but volume already trailing off,, eh  
looks like theres like no buy volume except 1 guy
Long at 8250. Stop Loss at 7980. Working so I can’t post any rationale
BULLSTAMP https://www.tradingview.com/x/7MXTkaoV/
A wild BGD on the 1m appears

How high will it go. Shorts are still pretty high and many shorted in the 8100-8200 range
Is there a way to have a mobile alert for tether prints? Looks like the market took about 20mins to fully react to it. 

On the other hand, now solidly underwater from my 8100 short. Holding til end of day. 
Time to test this theory that ETH has been leading BTC lately. It’s starting to dip right now.
Hey u/_chewtoy_,

Regarding my post earlier today, please accept my due apologies. I extend my apologies to chew’s friends and to the people in the sub.

I had no bad intentions as I speak. My only concern was that there are a lot of people that follow you and they might not be able to catch up with your pace of changing trades these past few days and perhaps could possibly end up holding bags. But then again, everyone is responsible for their own action, trades and analysis.

You are a great trader,  ~~I will particularly be very interested in following your TA and your entry points for the slightly longer terms trade.~~

Cheers!




Four identical looking bubbles

2011: https://bitcoincharts.com/charts/mtgoxUSD#rg360zigDailyzczsg2011-04-01zeg2012-03-15ztgSzm1g10zm2g25zcv

2013: https://bitcoincharts.com/charts/bitstampUSD#rg730zigDailyzczsg2013-03-01zeg2013-09-10ztgSzm1g10zm2g25zcv

2014: https://bitcoincharts.com/charts/bitstampUSD#igDailyzczsg2013-07-15zeg2015-08-14ztgSzm1g10zm2g25zcv

Present: https://bitcoincharts.com/charts/bitstampUSD#rg730zigDailyzczsg2017-11-01zeg2018-07-14ztgSzm1g10zm2g25zcv

Conclusion: Current movement on par for the course.
https://omniexplorer.info/address/3MbYQMMmSkC3AgWkj9FMo5LsPTW1zBTwXL

TETHER PRINTED
250mill
Let me find out I missed chewy being put on trial by whoever while I traveled today. For the three hundredth time don’t take financial advice from strangers friends or anyone.  Especially not on Reddit. And he alwayss says that.  Never spend more than you would be comfortable seeing lit on fire in your backyard. This is a young voliatile “market”. 


I have no idea what to do here still. The price being around 8200 for this long points to an upward trend building or at least a larger dip avoided but who the fuck knows.  I’m still in fist with buy orders to close out my short from 7780 down to 7180. Good luck everyone. Hope you get out and enjoy nature this weekend. I’ve got a few hiles planned. 
"#BuyTheDip" is going to hurt a lot of people here
F---. It's difficult. Despite calling two BGDs right, I still didn't do particularly well this last week. I'm down a bit, actually. Learned some lessons. Even swung by an alt-coin in the course of events, and got burned over there too. I was 100% long when the big green dildo occurred on April 14, but bailed out halfway up that candle. The next BGD I was also 100% long, but I stayed in too long when it hit resistance at $8400, and then the price dropped. After that, I kept my stops tight and tried scalping, but with little success. Overall, I am down about 4%. It's not a loss that I can't handle, but it s---.
https://www.tradingview.com/x/liAb6NFy/

Interesting long-term wedge that could last until mid June, hence why I lead towards the probability that 6k was the bottom.
Pretty sure this will pump to 8300 and dump back down
I know it is too early, but if we go up from here \(past 10k\) we would have the mega large scale iH&S

[https://imgur.com/a/hBAU22C](https://imgur.com/a/hBAU22C)
If bitcoin goes back to 8100’s, that would be a Tether Artificial Pump and Dump.

Bitcoin just turned into an alt coin for a hot second 
I think we won't break $8280, and then we will bounce off of $7800. 
the random green dildos seems to get smaller and smaller. I have a feeling whoever wants to push btc is running out of money or he's slowly giving up trying.  

I think revisiting the 7k-7.5k zone in the coming days is a higher possibility than us moving higher than 8.5k.

 It is safe to assume that all the guys who in it since 2011-12-13 are rich as fuck now?
[deleted]
Will the new Bitfinex Tax thing force many users to close all leveraged longs and shorts as they are forced off the platform if they dont comply?

If so as a side thing, there will be a massive drop in all interest rates as users return all loans and there wont be anyone left to borrow the funding available.

Is there an alternative exchange out there that offers the same things Bitfinex used to?
More stop hunting nonsense...but not a great way to guard against it.
Sold half at 8150, seems like there is still more pain to be had; heavy, heavy resistance at 8.2 range - I am going to wait for a re-test of 7.9 to re-add - my gut says we'll need to test 7.8 in earnest at some point though.  Either for a double bottom there or for the possible 1D H&S to manifest, depending on the strength/weakness of buying at that level (which would take down to a test of 6.8, for a double bottom there from right before the BGD last month).
Action Jackson?
Not a lot of people bought the "wedge within a wedge" idea I posted yesterday, but that little pump makes it look valid to me -  even though there wasn't a ton of volume on that breakout. Whether we continue up towards the larger resistance, or re-test, who knows.

https://imgur.com/a/YoiTNFQ
https://cryptowat.ch/markets/bitfinex/btc/usd/1m

Battle at 8200 going on.. stalemate for 15 minutes so far
I'm not ever one to say it but... Lets go to goblin town. 

My margin longs are ready to catch some knives. 


Closed my long as I think that's all bitcoin has to offer for now. Big green ones excepted.
trading stack short/hedged...

The sheer impotence of buyers is laughable.

If this BGDs to 8300+, I’m going to stop trading for a while.

This is being laddered down to 7500 if you ask
me
Bart, Bart?...is that you?
!short xbtusd 8204 2x 30%

Been in fiat since I flip-flopped positions a bit around 8.5k. So I’m effectively short still. But I’m adding a small short here.

There seems to be two channels at play currently. One small and one big: https://www.tradingview.com/x/4yQM97kI/

The R/R feels pretty ok for adding on top of this smaller channel.

Stops above the bigger channel, somewhere above 8450.

Edit: Zoomed-in version of the smaller channel: https://www.tradingview.com/x/hIvBKG8P/
Every second spent above $6000 makes me more bullish. And I thought I was already infinitely bullish yesterday.
If we are able to close above  $8,200 / $8,250, that I think will be very bullish. 

Yet the resistance lines lie ahead of us but when most are asleep, Bitcoin tends to shoot up, even with low volumes, we all know..
!short XBTUSD close 8400

As always, i am right about the trend, but as always, the high leverage fucks me over before going my way.
Wall Street bonuses, tax returns, Chinese New Year, February bull run, consensus 
Ladies and gentlemen, is this the inverse bart of yesterday nights price action or will it form a regular bart from here on. Place your bets now on bitmexico. (Winners will be announced in T-2-6h).
—Print 200 million Tether and paump it!

Is this the monthly bottom? Eyeing a short at 8400.
1hr RSI already up to 62... the same level as when we were over 8800. I doubt this will pump over the 8450 downtrend line today. In terms of opening a new long, I'm sitting this pump out for now.
[deleted]
Fuck I think I missed my last chance to get out with some good profit. Fucking dcb was so obvious. The dumb money is gone. This is going to go down just like 2014/15.
Goood Morning! Bitcoin failed to conquer the $8600 – $8800 resistance this week and there is a newly confirmed bearish trend on the shorter term. Lets take a look at the chart.

Bearish price action has tested the 8k support twice now on the near term and should it fail to summon the bulls it will soon become resistance. As I mentioned in my previous reports I would consider adding to long positions should we dip into the lower 7k zones.

Momentum is confirming the bearish trend for me at this point, higher risk traders could consider shorting should our current support fail. The volume is still kind of low going into the weekend, I will look out for some action on the markets today.

There are two possibilities today, in my opinion, should 8k step in as support we could see a good bounce here, back into the higher 8k zone, on the flipside should 8k fail I am sure the market will have to consolidate lower before we will witness the return of the bulls.

Longer term speaking I am bullish above $7200, but bearish on the shorter time frame, and looking for a possible bounce. Safe trades!

[You can find the charting magic here](https://cryptosignals.trade/forums/topic/bitcoin-btc-technical-analysis-may-2018/#post-17651)
I commented before as this is a little bit too awkward of a place to trade as 8000 really has no significant value other than a psychological number.

So on that note, I’m balls to the wall short from $8,121 with stops above $8300 because it’s close enough to $8200

Bears knocked it down from 8350-7900ish and bulls can only bring it up this high? Bears are currently in control. As Sloppy stated yesterday, Bulls keep buying the falling knife but as soon as a the price point gets high enough, they vanish into thin air.

!short XBTUSD 8121 5x 100% 
60 btc traded on the highest volume exchange the past 15 minutes  wowow such bullrun. i think we all saw how dead this market really is right now when bitmex crapped out yesterday, i think if you value your sanity you should just not trade until we get a weekly volume breakout because this randomness will probably just get worse
If those eth leading the way theories are true I think we are gonna move back down here 
Any bounce is being heavily shorted, if you’re long I would feel a lot better than being short from 8k. I think the eagerness to short is telling we may have further to go but the more shorts opening the bigger blastoff will occur. My guess is this doesn’t drop below 7.8 for any length of time in the coming week
Damn, took a hit again. Next time, take the money and run instead of wait it out. If this leg up barts down I'm taking a break until we have a real trend again.

!short xbtusd close 8230 
Please explain exactly how the printing of USDT affects the price of Bitcoin?


The Siimmmpppssoo - wait, that's it?
the community RSI is getting pretty low here, a pump is in order
We going down already? I haven’t even had my morning coffee yet. 
Lol, this Tom Lee guy just doesn’t give up pumping.

In a note to clients published ahead of this year's event, Fudstrat predicted a bump "likely greater" than in previous years "given dramatic jump in attendance plus the fact BTC is down YTD."

"While there was not a Consensus bump, our conviction on crypto-currencies strengthened during the conference," said Fundstrat co-founder Tom Lee, who is the only major Wall Street strategist to cover bitcoin.
Man, it's getting awfully bearish in here if that's an indication for anything..
Dip buyers already out of steam. Time to reshort
!long XBTUSD 0x 7990 100%

Basically moved everything from Bitmex to the cold storage, especially with the crazy shit going in the last days with this site.

This is becoming untradeable even for gamblers like me.
I wish you a happy nice summer y'all! See you in December!
Since the last bgd from 8300-8700, it looks like we've been in a pattern of sideways, small pump, big dump, repeat. But those don't really look like bear flags. Is it just battlegrounds with the bears winning? 
Tether pump happening now?
RSI is below 40 on 3, 6, 12 and 24 hours charts. Moreover, we've experienced four daily red candles in a row (excluding today). 

Unlike the RSI when we were falling from $9,000, does it mean anything in this range?
I'm starting to think last days were some kind of obfuscated accumulation for btc and eos. Once the bch bottom was in today, everything started together. Could be a sucker's rally or the bottom is in, anyone's guess.
None of my buys hit on the most recent dip but I won't be moving them. I do think we are bottoming out here but I also think that we'll make another move down there soon. Chasing a rally will usually lose you money so I think the R/R of longing right now is not good. I will be patient and stick to my entry. 

However, I may short Sept. futures and long spot. I think I may be able to close both in profit in the next 24 hrs. 
I can see a few barts popping up before this bear flag breaks down further so keep the leverages low people.
If you're looking to make money and actually contribute to this revolution, take it from me and spend less time on this sub.

Blunt observation: Chickens with their heads cut off chasing $100 rise/falls on 10x (or more) leverage. Kids with $5k hoping to long/short Bitcoin and become a millionaire in a month.

Wish you all the best. I'll personally be taking a break to found a blockchain company (no, friends, not an ICO, a company that utilizes blockchain). Have fun while I'm gone, bears.     
*loud fart*
How much does it take to push around order books on GDAX? 
15 min bbands are super tight, not expecting any huge moves here, but something will probably happen in the next 15-30 minutes as they normally don't stay this tight very long. 
[deleted]
People are getting weary waiting for mass adoption.  they’re less concerned about the tech than they are using crypto.  the network effect has been stale since 4Q17 and unless we see some publicity the price will continue to decline.  what we need is for something like amazon to accept crypto
I hate these $8200 bitcoins so much, show me something new! $8200 been waving around in my face on and off for months now. If I wanted them I'd have bought them already dammit! Get off me you desperate 3rd world street merchants!
All this desperate effort by bears yesterday and they're back where they started - above the invincible $8200 mark.
Can someone explain why newly printed tether generally leads to a pump in price?
16M+ Millionaires in the USA.

How many can realistically hold >=1 BTC (if for no other reason than insurance against politicians/bureaucrats)?
Such interesting, much wow, took an entry at 7950 and went into some alts, let's see how this plays out.

Making some coffee and chilling. Waiting to see what ze Koreans do. 
Bought at 7960 yesterday, sold at 8142 today. Hope I can rebuy lower \(around 8k\), if we get out of the wedge, I hope I can rebuy at 8142. It looks like we need to test the downside of the wedge again, but often if it looks like "that will happen" the oppsoite happens. So a BGD would not surprise me. 
Didn't want to set orders while I slept without being able to evaluate things, so I missed adding to my short at 8150, which would've been nice. Considering adding here but will wait it out, still too choppy for me.

Still long from 7985 and short from 8160. lol, what a tight range. seems a bit silly now that I type it out.
Oh well, I got caught in that bear trap , but can't win them all.   We will probably be pumped higher now,.
Here ya go. Good ol' beartrap to kickstart a rally. 10.2 by weekly close. https://www.tradingview.com/x/8Hn1SCny/
Remember 3k bottom? It was beartraps all the way up until 5k breakout rally. Don't be the one shorting the equivalent of 5k.
stay patient ppl. 7800 will come. then ill pounce
[removed]
[deleted]
[removed]
There seems to be a doji bottom on the daily. Can we consider this as an indicator for short / mid term reversal?
30min RSI still has some air.  

I am not shorting/longing, but If I was, I'd probably wait for a short around 8.3k+ (if it happens soon).  
For a long definitely sub 7.8k at least.  

Let's see how this plays out.

I am out of alts since yesterday as I was expecting shit to go down more.  
At least FIAT grows.

Man, this is a battle Royale! I think Dumpy has a few more coins to sell, and I hope Pumpy lets him sell at a loss. Have some fiat. Looking to buy at 7500, from whence I think a gargantuan GD might spring up. It would be a good third higher low. If it doesn't go there by Monday, I'll buy at whatever price because I think Dumpy will give up at that point, and we go up.
Told ya it was a beartrap https://www.tradingview.com/x/wTD7WQsf/
250 million tether just printed. Watch out bears. 
making longs in a bear market....uh huh....
I am totally back to being bearish again. Till we break 9800-10000
Ok, we dumped enough and my initial honest target of $7,8k was almost met, which is close enough for me. All in long, no more dips, ath coming.
As expected the bears failed to finish their food and keep BTC below 8k for a 6 hour period. Expecting us to dick around 8100 for a while before moving upwards, unfortunately selling pressure seems to be easing.
Fat fingered while setting a stop on my short and exited the position

Ah well I will watch and wait
I love how people here are talking like they know what's going on.....hilarious
Thank you tether for curb stomping my short with cowboy boots. 

They always love to print more Tether after the price dumps significantly! 
A close above $8250 could prove to be fatal for bears!
this market needs to dump as it was supposed to have done last month so that it can recover properly

all these attempts to stop it and "hold it in" is causing this prolonged battle

let it dump and it will recover 

we would be over 10k by this time were it not for this mess
If you seek clarity in terms of Bitcoin:

1) sell your stack
2) sell your cold storage
3) do not hodl

May you be free now to seek the truth.  At this point u/SloppySynapses comments may resonate with you.

Bear incoming - $4.5k by end of year.

Good luck all.
Looks like we recovered and we got the $7k-something everyone was hoping for and expecting. That was the last major dip, and buying now will be one few moments left in the entire history and future of bitcoin were purchasing a piece of this valuable digital, highly-sought after, revolutionary code below $10k will be possible. Smart money has been accumulating and soon they won't be able to sppress price much longer. I highly advice everyone with shorts to close it and I highly encourage everyone waiting on the sidelines to not do so and go all in fast now!
Shorting until 5k
Considering closing my recently opened leveraged long because of lack of momentum, it, after all, mite look like the bulls are too week after all. Have to study the charts a bit more and see what parabolic trav and thomas lee advice, if their advice remains unchanged the next 7.5 hours, I will keep my leveraged long or re-open it if I have closed it by that time. Drop below $8k could prove to be fatal. 
https://www.coindesk.com/cme-groups-leo-melamed-well-tame-bitcoin/
I assume those calling a bear trap expect a retrace back above $8400 and a resumed uptrend rather than a 50% or w/e retrace into a further drop. 
7910 wasn’t good enough? Lmao 
Where did you close your short?
the similarities are insane.. Break 6k to cause panic then rocket up?
Whilst I agree with the fact that this might be accumulation, I'm also waiting for a clearer picture and also with the fact that there's still plenty of downside room before our trends converge/in the triangle. I'll reconsider if we make a rounded-bottom type formation, or break our resistance like from ATH. 
I agree with the range you're showing, though I always become a bit weary as things start to become obvious because that's when people get caught with their pants down. Though I'd say taking profit on longs at the upper band of the range is an obvious choice, opening **shorts** there might be risky, as a significant pump could occur if we do go beyond that upper band.

Edit; some grammar. 

Edit2: longs --> shorts. I'm an idiot.
That's an interesting chart. The only thing that really bothers me is that it doesn't take into account a breakout that is likely to eventually happen. Trends are solid for TA, but eventually we will just hit a number that traders will see as too good to pass up and it will break out of that channel. 

Maybe I'm just reading it wrong. I've only been learning this TA thing for a few months now and still have a long way to go to be what I would consider proficient.
High level post! Thanks.
I will come out and say this:

anyone being smug about another users trades in the sub is on my shit list (if that means anything to anyone)

No “I told ya so” bullshit or I will write a bot to PM you pictures of [salt mines in bolivia](https://cdn.opendemocracy.net/files/imagecache/wysiwyg_imageupload_lightbox_preset/wysiwyg_imageupload/557099/Mina%20de%20sal%20en%20Uyuni_1.jpg ) every minute of every day for all eternity.

You will never get another PM again
What do you think of mysql101 chart?

https://www.tradingview.com/x/uogWMEcS/

Stay strong Chewy, we are one.
Yeah, that seems the goal of this pump, though it's more aggressive then you'd expect. Maybe a bit of stop hunting on the shorts. 

Good to hear you're doing well!
> As for anyone concerned about my mental or emotional wellbeing, trust me, I'm fine.

That's what they all say :)
Position closed with success



* Position: long xbtusd

* Opening value: 8,030.00

* Average value: 8,025.00

* Closing value: 8,245.00

* Leverage: 5.00X

* Stack: 30.00%

* PnL: 2.49%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


I'm checking this [Small wedge](https://imgur.com/a/0kPR5I2) about to reach the apex.
Since it has faked out bellow, my money is on it breaking upward. I entered a long around the same time you did. Was considering closing half here just in case it falls, but i'll let it ride.

I need to thank you for the last trades, i followed you and did well. Slowly starting to recoup my losses.

As i'm writing this it seems i was wrong and this will drop here... Lets wait and see.
>Pretty surprised to see price back above $8,100 so quickly.

Really? It's only a 100ish dollar move. Previous to the drop we had been trading in  a 8200 - 8400 range of movement which is around the same range. When i woke up this morning and seen that bears had failed to keep it below 8k i honestly expected 8300+ by now.
This does look a little bartish, except tor the extremely sharp V going into it.
[deleted]
It's interesting but that sync could break any time is my thinking.
The channel for each of them separately seems to have more meaning
yeah this is getting stair cased down instead of just letting it crash down 
I couldn't succeed to get any profits really until I started setting predefined ladders right from the start of a trade.  It opens up a lot of possibilities too.  Like, if it goes down, you take 50%, but then it retraces 50% of that.  Well, now you can add 25% back, and your ca is still comfortably away from the current level, but if you close at break even, you don't feel as bad about missing profits.

You get smaller wins, but at least you get wins.  And you really, really minimize losses, especially losses that came from holding an unclaimed former win back across the CA in denial because you didn't take any profits.

Getting the "big one" on this strategy is kinda fucked though.  But you can add to the position as you go down.  Which in the end becomes insured scalping with a distant CA, because your ladder is also taking profits on the way down!  (though once I think I sold into my own buy on a market order during a laggy wick.... so this can get ridiculous)
Nice, more purchasing power for my cryptooo
mmm... tuna sub...
Did the same at pretty much the same price (I had a short and long open and closed the long). Although if this pops back over say 8230-8250 I might start scratching my head a bit. 
!long XBTUSD close 8220

!short XBTM18 8265 7x 25%
Just woke up in the middle of the night and was thinking the same thing since it's back below the same place again as where we opened the short yesterday.  Geez
Question: And I don't know if this should be obvious or not, so hopefully it isn't a stupid question. But is there any difference between doing 10x leverage with 5% of stack instead of 1x leverage with 50% of stack? If there is no difference then why not use 1x leverage with 50% of stack?
You done goofed...gonna hold till liquidation or?
Bounce off $8300 down to $8000 then ping pong back up and through. I'm already long so will hold through, but that's my guess based on sentiment, near-support and near-resisitence. If we're under $8300 tomorrow then i was wrong. 
10X? That seems quite a bit higher leverage than you usually trade, or am I confused?
Hmm, I wouldn't underestimate the effect of Europe waking up to some green. Good luck.
I am wondering - do you use any kind of analysis in your trades or are they mostly sentiment based? Do you use anything to find good entry/exit points?
I like how that's 5%. Good luck!
On the other hand, lot of thin air after the 7900 volume node though.
hahaha. I read it out as if BTC climbed to $9,150
can you DM me your username? id like to look into that
[deleted]
this BGD has to be at least.. $300 bigger than this!
Gotcha, nn m8
> synthetic phallus pattern finding mode

these five words have probably never been strung together in this order in all of human history. 

also, great post!
this market is irrational af , this craziness can go for a long time 
Really nice post with great analogies! Thanks for sharing :)
Thanks for your well thought out post.
The exact same mindset I have. I've been looking at this with a macro view. Global Markets are not doing too hot and I am certain that a new financial crisis will occur within the next few years. That, imo, will be when BTC will rise to new highs as well as the other alts. 

My big thing reason for remaining bullish is that once regulations are in place, globally, people will see it as a legitimate asset to hold in their portfolio.
Nice post for long term sentiment but you don't actually detail why fundamentals are strong. You kind of just hand wave that it's a given that institutional money is coming in droves and they'll carry the space to new heights. 

What is the use case? What will we actually use it for? Why should institutional investors be interested in using it aside from as a way to sucker retail investors out of money? 

This has been an ongoing question for years and until it is answered and subsequently *actually used* there won't be a next bubble. 

We just saw the price rocket up 2000% with adoption generally *decreasing*. 

You can't really hand wave fundamentals anymore; I don't see any large merchant adoption incoming. Most large institutions seem much more interested in creating their own tokens and coins and using blockchain tech with a weak relationship to bitcoin. 

In my opinion, this is a nice feel good sentiment post, but it's basically just a nicely wrapped "oh, just wait for institutional investors to jump in. It's going to be huge." with no real foundation to stand on. 

We have Jack Dorsey, CEO of Twitter, endorsing bitcoin as the money of the internet but he can't even get his team to get rid of spam comments that are an *awful* look for the entire space. The Square team has made no money on their bitcoin investment, and constantly has internal fights over whether or not they should even use it. I believe Square has actually lost money on investing in it. 

https://www.google.com/amp/s/mobile.reuters.com/article/amp/idUSKCN1IH2LE

Every attempt to adopt by a merchant has ended in internal arguments and questions that lead to the merchant eventually dropping it. Does this not worry *anyone* here? 

edit: I guess I just feel like I'm missing the part where people just assume merchants and institutions are desperate to adopt it. It seems like they're tentatively interested because of the price explosion and volatility but aside from that there's no real use case yet. 

It feels like this is just a big meme bitcoin holders have been passing around for years as hope for the future. Well, it's the future, and I don't really see anything particularly bright. We see just as many companies adopting and developing shitcoins as we do bitcoin. 

It seems like most merchant adoption is brought on by one or two very enthusiastic bitcoin holders on a development team where the majority of the team sighs and groans as they take orders to develop a payment system for bitcoin. Eventually it becomes too much of a pain in the ass to maintain and they get rid of it

I appreciate the effort, but it just seems like you're mainly relying on that last portion: some crazy event that sparks another bubble for a little bit. I don't think it's sustainable. There needs to be an actual use case. 

This whole thing just reads like all those "Here's why I'm bullish on crypto." posts in /r/cryptocurrency. You can use this post for virtually any shitcoin in the space. 
One of the best written, "eyes open" posts I've seen in a long time.  This is 100% my outlook as well.  One thing to note - it seems the longer the "accumulation" period has lasted, the more explosive our bull run went.  So with that in mind, I welcome the 2 year bear period and hope it lasts even longer.
You say this crash could be comparable to the 2014 crash, but that crash was mostly caused by a catastrophic black swan event. right now its just a bubble pop, i just don't see how you could compare the two events. 
Nice post and I agree with everything written.
Well put analysis. I agree that a shitcoin purge is definitely needed, the myriad forks and ICOs are draining funds from legit projects out there, BTC included. A combination of regulation and bitcoin price fluctuation such as this is taking care of that. But frankly I don't see a multi-year bear market. Maybe BTC price will not pass ATH until the next halving, but the infrastructure of the crypto space as a whole is maturing rapidly. Top coins are doing a lot of development and making great connections after connections. BTC as the flagship may need some time to cool off while absorbing the shitcoins.
If I remember correctly, the first bubble got bitcoin from $0.8 to $30, then crashed to $1 and took about a year to recover to and beyond $30. Then the second bubble got bitcoin from $180 to $1200, then crashed to $160 and it took three years to recover to $1200 and beyond. Finally, we have the third bubble, $4000 to $19000, and we've crashed to $6000. I think we'll take a little more than a year after the peak to recover to and past $19000. 
>Do not pass the opportunity to take advantage of the discounts of the next few years. Its very likely the last one you will get.

Hahaha, we've heard that before, BTC will never go below 15k, 14k, 13, 12k, 10k....oh where are we now?

How about the reality i.e. people just do not care about crypto now, especially as large numbers were burnt in January, there may well never be another significant bull run, something which this sub seems in total about the possibility of.
> I have no doubt BTC will revisit and surpass 20k

Stopped reading at there.  Another delusional longterm bull.  I have doubts that it will drop to $3K or go up to $20K.  Neither are anywhere close to 100% probability.
Great post. Couldn't agree more that the shitcoin space needs a major purging.

We will be range-bound for a while, it seems. That's fine with me. Lived it before. Glad I bought during that time. Up, down, or sideways, I'll be buying for the next year at least.
Bisq is most likely the way of the future. Just needs more users now. Perfectly adequate P2P exchange software. 
I think bitmex has quite low fees comparatively, but in general the first decentralised exchange that runs smoothly and has margin will be great.  One problem is now do they make money, if they have 0.1% fee I can just fork it and offer 0.05% fee, and so on and so on.


Isnt the fact that 8k is acting like a tractor beam concerning at all? It just cannot escape it. Wont the bulls eventually give up?
As others have said. It might not be perfect but a nice write up showing a confluence of indicators pointing at a short term bounce. Well done for putting the effort in and sharing your ideas. Keep learning and and trade well.
Well its certainly possible but I look at it more as if we’ve broken down on the daily bands and now we’re riding them down(google riding bollinger bands), we broke under 50day ma, 0.5 fib and closed under the daily cloud which for me is confirmation of a bearish trend. On my chart the next stop is 50 weekly ma. Also does the bull div count if you skip a bottom like that? Its not really clean
We're up $300 from local low, so suuuuper bullllish!  
that dipends 
looks like a little bit of a pump within 40 minutes of the tethers going into bitfinex.

Where do I see that?
We could be back at 8050 in a matter of hours, best to let these things just happen. It looked gloomy, so you didn’t make a wrong call there. Trade on what you see, not on what you hope. 
Reopened a hedge long here, should've kept my earlier one open but oh well. Looking to break 8.2, and really 8.4, for this to mean anything. 
!short XBTM18 close 8135
You should probably set tighter stops next time.

You guys trading 5x of your stack without tight stops are insane. You're gonna get wiped out one day 

Well I guess you did have stops, my bad. it also depends if 100% of your stack is all you have or if it's just a trading stack 
Close half and set stop loss for the rest
If you didnt have a position right now, what would you do : long, short or out of position? 

Also maybe reduce leverage if you are playing with your entire stack 
Would definitely close part at BE if you can, Its very unlikely we’re out of our downtrend and bottomed right here. 7800 is way too close, so you definitely want to reduce your risk. 
Btc denied the 7.8 bids because everyone wanted it. Close most and let a bit ride I'd say.
I guess we are in the same boat. I have already placed a limit sell right above my B/E point. 

I think it is necessary to clear my head before I move on and continue trading. 

On the other hand, if there are more green candles, than letting the position ride is not that bad idea. 

Only time will tell.
Gonna rip it from their cold dead hands!
Yeah it coincides nicely with the 50 weekly ma, our breakout point and the descending trendline from 20k. Im aiming at 7.2-7.4k
Fractals/ Patterns are real no shame 
Wouldn't be surprised at all.
https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8jmkwf/bitmex_options_shenanigans/
You think we’re going back to 9k?
I’m still shorting
Bandz a make her dance
a BGD will loosen them.
( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
Yeah that's a bull div, same on the 1h, but until btc gets above 8400 then there is a bearish hidden div on madc and rsi on the 1h. Div's are useful in confluence with other signals, like support and resistance, trend lines, fib levels, chart and candle stick patterns. 

There's a sentence that goes something like "Trade when the trend is strong (or weak if your a contrarian but essentially with momentum on your side) at the right time(cycle aka overbought/oversold/chart/stick patterns) with support at your back (aka support areas/trend lines/fib levels), confirmed by a higher time frame (Have some sort of confirming signals on a higher time frame)".

You wont always have everything on your side, but when most of the signals line up then you have a high probability trade on your hands, after that just control your risk and bam, profit??? For some good candlestick/chart patterns check out thomas bulkowski's site. Best of luck.
I mentioned it yesterday, but people pointed out the fact that I am skipping some dips so it might not be valid. At least that’s what I got from it.
it's been discussed, and it's probably playing out right now 

keep in mind there's a small hidden bearish divergence right before that one. 
Please increase your short leverage, I’m still long. 
Shorters got that apple bottom positions with leverage like furr,
When they hit their sells everyone's looking at her,
They hit the floor, next thing you know,
Shorters got low low low low.
last time they printed that much we dumped really hard if i remember correctly
Finally, saved by bfx at last! 
Maybe to cash out? 
And how about these [200M tethers that were printed this morning?](https://omniexplorer.info/address/1NTMakcgVwQpMdGxRQnFKyb3G1FAJysSfz/1)
Holy fuck, they don't want to waste a single minute. Damn.

And its a 1,000 BTC wall. FUUUUUUUUU
And what if they are used as margin to short 250MM++ worth of BTC? 🤔
Didn't btc dump last time it was printed ?
Finally the *Big Consensus Pump* is in....

~~EDIT: /s~~
EDIT2: /S
I don't think i'm noob, it's not always FOMO. I just bought more under 8k because the price seemed quite cheap and it was enough for me. Will hodl for a while now. No stops. I believe in the tech, so I'm long term bullish and I'm investing small amounts buying all deeps I find quite attractive. Under 8k was one of those deeps. This strategy worked well for me for a while now. I just think there are lot of big players out there pumping and dumping all they want and manipulating the price as much as they can to bring maximum pain and take maximum profit, and trying to overtrade is too risky because of them. So basically, buy & hodl till profit. Then sell and repeat buying the deeps or just increase your stacks if you can/want.
Agreed
Uh huh
How many trades do you make on average in a week and how many hours do you spend looking at charts?

That would give us noobs here some perspective 
Hedge short or just trading stack?

Asking for a friend
Shorting below the resistance line of the falling wedge is not to smart if we are tempting a breakout. If the breakout doesn't happen it's a good short but I don't see this going down a lot more.
Don’t see a good RR for a short. Here’s my perspective: 
On longer timeframes: 
The 6hr candles closes been rejecting 8k, 4 consecutive daily red candles and rounded bottomish feel 

On shorter timeframes: 
The 30m was going for a bullflag with upward wicks off 8050. The flag clearly broke down but I see it as another one of the head fakes of this weird market. 

It looks like it will drop below 8k seconds after I write this but gonna post anyway. Good luck with the trade! 


How much downside do you expect that justifies the risk (stops 200 above entry)?
>
_chewtoy_ 15 points an hour ago
>
Pretty surprised to see price back above $8,100 so quickly.
I'm pretty skeptical that this will continue to move up, but I'm still holding my long for now.
I'll close it around break even if it drops below $8,000 again.

Huh?????
Why close the long and then immediately open a short? 

Seems a little greedy to me honestly. All signs do point to it going down but you could just wait for it to go lower and grab a better entry long or if it poops up to 8200 open the short there.

Its no mans land imo but I guess do what you think is best.
can we put a tether heart tattoo on the bitcoinmarkets hoodies?
what you mean? sorry im new.
What if this entire pump was a reaction to the fact that new USDT has been issued?
Short closed at 8230, had opened a hedge long at 8130 so I'm safe for the moment. 
[removed]
When people chide you for opening a position at a local top or bottom, it's generally a decent position. Good luck
Could go well. I bailed on my short (from the same entry) just below, but that's mostly because I'd held it through heavy profit and didn't want to take a loss. 
ballsy
Sounds bad.
Replace $3K with $200 and $20K with $1,000 and you've got the same comment that I imagine was posted dozens of times by dozens of different posters throughout 2014. 

I'm not saying that $3,000 is a likely prospect in the immediate future, but I'd argue the most delusional stance is that any price point is off limits. 

Bitcoin doesn't *have* to be worth anything at all. Let alone the $100K or $1MM that many assume it will someday be valued at. 
People should stop calling others delusional on an event that's totally possible but not yet occurred. Delusional bulls where right for a few weeks at least, we shouldn't have hit 20k like we did. Maybe the bears will have their turn? From experience in BTC this is usually what happens but hey maybe this time it's different?
we touched 3k on September 14 at 14:00 UTC

Get your facts straight homie
true 

we will go sideways forever just like bitcoin always has 
we touched 3k on September 14 at 14:00 UTC

I remember like it was yesterday 

Get your facts straight homie
I think that's a decent idea.  It's possible we are in a wedge with about that range, and there is still room for oscillations in both directions.  If we go lower I'd hold that long bag and dca it.  But if we go higher I wouldn't hold the short bag i'd let it go.
Out of interest.  If 8000 breaks at what price do you envisage your next long entry will be?
This is something everyone was talking about a few weeks ago, but then sort of forgot in between calls for moon and goblintown more recently. 

I don't think we'll actually go all the way down to retest that orange support though -- it's far too obvious and too many people would count on it being *the* reversal, and setting up buys well in advance to make sure they don't miss it, I think. But if we chopped around and eventually drifted down to ~7200ish levels or so, I would be neither surprised nor worried, based off that. 
The top of the window. Paint brush icon. 
If you've made 5% then I would close the long and just let the BTC ride. 
> I'm drinking a coffee so probably won't sleep anyway

What % cocaine is in that coffee?

You're trying to trade one of the most untradeable ranges we have. It's probably the absolute worst range, really. and you're at a really awkward entry, $200-300 above potential support. Set stops in profit and wait for $7699 and $9300 to see where this is going 
You're not going to like what you see when you get back from that coffee.
Too early to call, but time will tell.   With all the tether printed, this rally could have legs, but got to think it will ultimately be another DCB.  There is just not many signs of increased BTC adoption to justify higher demand and a significantly higher price.  Speculative buying only works for so long.
mate we're up like 3%. Did u really expect bitcoin to just tank to $3?

A bear trap is when we make a new high.. right now this is more likely to be a bull trap than anything 
A bit early to be saying the dip to 7950 was a bear trap. We pumped off a tether print and couldn't even hit 8300. If we break and hold 8450, then it was a bear trap. 
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
What's up with all the denial https://www.tradingview.com/x/ZdIV049j/
This is a textbook b e a r t r a p. You call that a correction, with volume fading out relative to the earlier weeks? It was re-accumulation, and you better join the side with momentum. 
the 1k buy wall just got sold into. 800btc 1min candle, pretty hefty. Let's see what happens now. 

Edit: Big short just opened up, which was that spike. 
That’s cool, good luck with work and with your trade!
Also got a feeling that this might be the end of correction?

At first I was waiting for 7200-7800, but after seeing countless tweets, charts, posts and comments on reddit how everyone expects the price to go to that level I started to think that it’s unlikely for btc to meet everybody’s expectation. 
Also Kraken BTCEUR wicked from 6800 to 7010 for a second due to a ~400 coins market buy.
yep. pretty cool candle. Bitfinex sent 200 million tethers 40 minutes ago and I went long 25x on bitmex expecting a pump, closing at a snazzy profit now.

thx tether

guys its pretty easy. you set up alerts on the tether wallets. go long when tethers go from the tether treasury to bitfinex, and go short when tethers go from bitfinex to tether treasury.

so far it's literally worked every fucking time. you're basically front running bitfinex traders. 
literally untradable.
just keep in mind this $7800 to $8200 range is land of the barts. This is where we had like 3 days of barts before we went down the last time we were here
It's just a coincidence. Tether is probably used to pump alts more than btc. And then these alt bags are dumped on noobs to accumulate more btc, which is then used to accumulate alts etc. 

never ending cycle of dumping bags on noobs 
I closed my short. Will reshort if need be
I absolutely don't think the market reacted to it. Purely technical factors, don't dismiss the alts influence as it's a whole ecosystem : eth daily looks good unlike btc. Eos launches in 15 days. Bch bounces. All of this has an influence, as obviously bulls can only profit from a (maybe temporary) shift in momentum in a bear market to get a bit of traction.
It also came up against a downtrend line I have on the daily . . https://www.tradingview.com/x/kqbbFHtM/
Yea noticed that dump fiest.. Btc followed
Omg you guys are lucky he even shares his trades with you. Let the guy do his thing without worrying about all the hangers-on his coattails. 
Not in a position to comment on any of this, but this is a cool move to step up to your actions. Good job. 
r/bitcoinsoliloquy
So that'd put us where? Around 5K?
Well time to close my short for an artificial pump and dump 
USDT gotta make moves before Circle moves in on their stablecoin effective monopoly. I'll allow it.
all it says is that a big move is coming , who knows which way
no omni protocol found, wut
It's so beautiful, so easy to go long
Wait. WHAT?! (about Chewy)
Definitely not the place to buy. Check the 1D RSI people who disagree and compare it to previous examples. 

#Goblintown
You win some, you lose some. Try to not revenge trade / force a profitable trade. Wait for the opportune moment where the r/r is good. Don't worry though, you'll make it back soon enough. 
It happens to almost everyone mate. Learning is the best thing to do here. :)
Like many, I feel with that geometry we should consider it a symmetric triangle.

If we were to then consider it a continuation pattern of BTC regular growth, I think it's ok to ignore the upper parabolic part, that's crazy town.

But I'm sort of just fitting a permabull narrative there. (am primarily a holder)

Anyway, those are the lines for outer limits of trading strategy for the foreseeable future for sure.
Your lower line goes back even further than that on bitfinex.  It joins up perfectly with one in November.  Seems like that would make it even more valid.  3 touches on each now!

https://www.tradingview.com/x/44CIcyhZ/
Bartish
Aren't the market cap charts a little...questionable?

Like...90% or something ridiculous of all ripple is owned by one dude, isn't it?

Is that really liquid money in the space?

Alts have awful liquidity, you could add a coin that adds $200m to the market cap pretty easily. 
Why is it artificial ? People buy tether so they can purchase BTC and other coins on exchanges that cannot accept fiat. Isn't it about time we stopped with all the Tether FUD ?

I read this 7.8k number so many times, if we go down I think we will just go directly to 7.6k or we dont see this number in this cycle. Why 7800 USD? Is this the holy number?
Also if we don't get above 8400, we might see a hidden bearish divergence on the 1h.


So that's something to keep in mind as well.
Depends on the Big Dumper. Is he out of coins? Does he need to cover? Big bears will run out of coins long before big bulls will run out of fiat IMO. BTC is quite a bit rarer than USD, EUR or any of that stuff.
“The fair price of Bitcoin at this point in time is 7500 USD”

- L14dy (pretty much all year)
remember when everyone shorted btc about 1 month ago before it pumped? i think this is happening again when we see long vertical movement.
Bought my first btc in 2011. I don't consider myself rich, but I am definatly better off than i would have been. Recently paid off my car and student loans thx to btc. Other than that I havnt yet amassed life changing wealth. What you need to understand is hindsight is 20/20. I bought my first coins for single digits.. at the time the first major bubble had collapsed and noone was sure it would ever recover. People were still amazed it was worth > $1. I was interested in the project and considered it akin to buying lottery tickets.. i spent more on coffee than on bitcoin. Plus ive lost what would amount to over 100k today in various exchange collapses and investment schemes (does anyone remember when crypo stock exchanges  ala Havelock were a big thing?). I did have enough sense to squirl away a modest amount in cold storage, which was the smartest financial move ive ever made. Again hind sight is 20/20 if i would have done a few things differently i would be a multi millionaire by now buy alas i still have to goto work everyday like the rest of the plebs. No point getting to mad about it though all we can ever do is deal with the situation in front of us.
Not all. A lot of us "took profits" at some point or made a stupid trade that wiped out a good portion of the stack. That's why I mainly buy the dips and hodl. 
I'm not.... I'll tell you why:

I was mining BTC in 2011. The problem is, while you could make several coins a day, they were worth almost nothing, basically had about the value as the power it took to make. Anyone shilling bitcoin had a vested interest in doing so, in order to try to create value for the coin, so I viewed them as being partisan. Additionally, coveting bitcoin is like coveting a glass of water. Anyone can easily get their own at any time, with little effort. It would be like you coveting reddit posts or something. Buying bitcoin seemed stupid when you could make them easily.

While I liked the idea behind bitcoin, I didn't see it going anywhere and abandoned it. I don't know where my wallet.dat file is, or even remember how much I mined. I don't have my old computers, so I can't even check the hard drives.

Later as the price went up to $10, I'm like, fuck that. It was just pennies the other day. When it hit $100, I'm like, fuck that. It was just $10 the other day. I have a friend who sold his at $50. He refuses to buy it anymore because its overpriced. Nothing over $50 is worth it to him...

When it hit $4k last year, it finally clicked in my head that maybe it wasn't just being shilled by partisans. So I bought my first bitcoin at $4.7k. That was ATH at the time, so I fully expected to take some losses on it.. it immediately dropped almost 1k, but I've been in the clear since then, while adding to my position when I see market bottoms.
Plenty will have been Rekt well before the giant bull run. I came across an old thread on another forum where someone was asking if it was possible to short it at 70 cents per coin.
2011 = yes 2012=depends on when and how much 2013 not rich as fuck, or if you put a large enough amount into it. 

it all depends on how Risk averse you have been. Maybe you heard of bitcoin and thought to yourself lets buy 10, its cheap. you are Not rich as fuck now. if you thought lets put 50.000 Dollar into it yolo,  then yes.
Since this is a trader/trading sub, I will give you the trading-answer to your question.

Becoming rich as a trader has nothing to do with the price itself. It doesn't matter whether the price goes to 1 dollar or 100.000 dollar. A trader will lose money consistently in the first year regardless from price going up or down. It will take A LOT of time for a trader to develop a winning strategy on which he earns CONSISTENT income over time. A succesfull trader is independent from the price itself, and will make consistent income whether the price crashes, pumps or stays flat for a whole year.

What does matter here is time. It took me 3 years to master the skill of trading and in those years I probably went broke about 10 times. They key is time, and not the what the price is/has been doing.

So..two different answers to your question:

1) Tradertheory: 2013 is about 5 years ago. If you were a trader and you are still here, and you corrected your mistakes and strategy during these years, then yes, you could be rich now depending on your trading style. But you would be rich aswell if bitcoin was now 1k.

2) Holdertheory: It's really easy to judge someone who knew of bitcoin early on. It's really easy to say well wow how didn't you get rich that's bullshit, you've been an idiot. You had bitcoin in 2011 and you're not rich? Idiot. Well let's say you bought bitcoin at 5USD, and it went to 10USD. Out of this world no? You doubled your money? What about 20USD or 50USD. 1000% increase. Who are you to not sell those coins? Even if you're a firm believer of the blockchain then this must be really itching to cash out right? 100USD? 2000% increase.. If someone said to me they are holding bitcoin from those low prices, he's either a genius or a crazy lunatic. It's not that easy. You should ask yourself the question whether you would be rich if you knew about bitcoin before 2013. I bet the answer is yes. I bet everyone would say yes ofcourse I would!... think again.
Not necessarily, it seems contradictory but I've seen it repeated by many people that it actually becomes harder to hold the further in the green you are. So what happens is you get people who sell between 10-50x their initial investments which was incredible at the time but quite small in hindsight 
... Ok and what is the problem?
In 4-5 years we will be rich af too 
Nope; people going to prison for "economic terrorism" and being aware that this wasn't the first attempt was more then enough doubt to do nothing

edit// ok downvotes I guess I'll explain further; I was in this space politically first and foremost I'm directly referencing liberty dollar https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Liberty_dollar_(private_currency) the judge on the case basicly said she padded the sentence because it was "economic terrorism" to try to start a private currency; this is something I've very much was aware of at the time, the past failure of private currencies being crushed by the state.

Being aware of the last century of failure of libertarian thought(world wars, drugwar, information state, economic insanity) does not inspire confidence along with the road seemingly being beaten down but not looking to closely at the tech. Mt gox had to fail, and not be bailed out before I even considered this as new territory. Black markets had to regrow when cut down.

I didn't believe until ~ half a decade after I heard about bitcoin, so no, I'm not insanely rich.... yet
How about sideways?
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Exactly this. 100% my opinion. Something is different. 
People offering funding could be leaving too. AFAIK funding rates went up last time when they had a "final warning" for US people. Not for too long though, so we will see.
I doubt many people w ill be leaving bitfinex.
Will this ladder down to 7500?

*asking you*
The 15/30m just looks like a bart waiting to happen
Too early to say.  But I hope so. Need to break that nasty 8,200 support. Went short x10 @8261
Stop-loss got hit.

!short xbtusd close 8311 100%
Every second spent below $10,000 makes me more bearish. And I thought I was already a douche yesterday
Ugh. 

Again Chad...?
What would make you not bullish. ?
Here you forgot this «/s»
Assuming we sleep...
All the weeks of support in the 8000's now comes back as resistance.
Do you mean the daily candle? Just to clarify.
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtusd

* Opening value: 8,194.00

* Average value: 8,194.00

* Closing value: 8,400.00

* Leverage: 44.00X

* Stack: 25.00%

* PnL: -2.76%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


https://twitter.com/eurtprinter/status/997547243946299392?s=20
Depending on how hard it pumps, heavy resistance at ~~9350~~  if it even gets there. Never say never, but above  ~~9350~~ seems unlikely for today. 

Edit:8350 for both
With the custom indicators, tasteful colors and nicely proportioned arrows, even if you're wrong(I don't think you are) you already one of the smartest lookin niggas around
No you didn't miss your last chance to get out with some good profit. That is what the lesson from 2014/2015/2016/2017 should be. Chill out do some other stuff and sooner or later you'll be able to get out with some good profit if you want to. People say year long+ bear market like it's the end of the world, it's not. Nor is it certain this will happen. Selling at a loss and then f-ing up your reentry is more likely to lose you money. This market rarely does slow and steady.
This has 2014 written all over it worryingly. Are we looking at a year long bear market... Then the big push after that.

People need to prepare for that 
are you out? cause this is no DCB.
Physiological or psychological? Also, while I agree with your sentiment I think it's pretty telling that sellers were only able to keep the price below $8,000 momentarily.
You’re a better man than me. I would never go 5x all-in short.

If this goes back to 8300... you lost half your trading stack
Also means the selling is tapering, goes both ways.
If volume goes down like crazy it does not mean in crypto automatically that price goes down.

check this chart: [https://imgur.com/a/AIugCGP](https://imgur.com/a/AIugCGP)
ETH is grinding on the upper bound, It could break up or down. We shall find out in 2 hours or less. Missed my short there by $0.01

Waiting to see if it goes for another test or not

ETH doesn't lead shit.
Eth is grinding, on low volume but selling is completely absent, could work
shorts went up by about 20 btc ... longs went up by 300 though. then down 100 so net +200.

shorts +20...

think people are just selling
Short are closing, its the longs selling. into short covering. There won't be a short squeeze.
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtusd

* Opening value: 8,070.00

* Average value: 8,070.00

* Closing value: 8,230.00

* Leverage: 10.00X

* Stack: 100.00%

* PnL: -2.23%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


It doesn't.
I wonder how the issuance of tether would compare to the USD inflation.
Imaginary money is created out of thin air and then used to buy BTC, which pushes the price higher.
[deleted]
Bart fakeouts are the new meta?
We keep trying to but on each pump the subsequent sell pressure is immense. It’s like someone is slapping us back down like a bitch every time and forcing into goblin town.
Hmmm.
Enjoy the coffee whilst you can still afford it.
It was just a fakeout.
I attended the conference.  I don't know how any serious minded person could not see that the conference was 5x as large, and that serious progress is being made with this technology in general on many fronts.

There wasn't a lot of hype, but there was a ton of substance.  The conference was full of very bright, serious minded people, committed to pushing this technology forward in a variety of ways to improve the world.  It wasn't a "get rich quick" conference, which I found refreshing.  I left with more conviction about the positive long term use (and price appreciation) of bitcoin than I ever remember having... and I've been pretty bullish for a long time.

I think Tom Lee's points are excellent.  I would be very surprised to see Bitcoin's price below these levels at the end of the year... even if they go lower first.
I like him. He's talking long term, and I believe he is correct. 

We'll know soon enough.
Tom Lee is an awesome guy. He's one of the few 'big guys' with credibility in the financial world that takes crypto seriously and has done for some time. He's only as right as his research tells him. He just assumes that whatever happened earlier, will happen again. It's called a model. You know, like economists or the weather service use and they can be wrong many times. 

His analysis is a lot more thorough than the average retail trader that draws lines on a chart they learned on investopedia.com. 

I don't understand the hate.  
It's Mr. Green. Looks like he is taking out some of the remaining active big sellers out of the market for one reason or another. 
he needs to learn to STFU, normies get dumped on whenever he shills. 
if you're suggesting the majority is often wrong here, you're on the wrong side. majority believes we're going  to $10001 before $5999.

66% to 34% with about 160 people polled.

and that was partially after we hit $7930. 

I imagine it'd be even higher now

https://strawpoll.me/15717650/r

I'm seriously so tired of people thinking it's bearish in here when the large majority is bullish.. Just because we're not all circlejerking about bitcoin going to $100m cause institutional money is coming soon doesn't mean the majority isn't bullish

The circle jerk is "wow so bearish...shorts about to get rekt" 

if u want to contrarian trade you can't just pick out 2 comments that contradict your position and justify it by saying you're a contrarian trader. 

The real contrarians are people shorting this thing to like $3-4k because almost everyone here is in complete disbelief that it could ever happen again

edit: sorry if this was rude, I love u
Strong buy signal if anything.  I knew it was time to buy when these guys were screaming for $3k back at 6.6 or so.
It's just an indicator that ppl stay longer than need be in their beliefs and fail to adapt quickly in an ever changing environment and sentiment. I'd keep a long below 7.9 and a short from 10k open for now, otherwise I'd take profit rather quickly, we're still nowhere but will probably see a bit of green for now.
Seems to me like more of a bull flag. 
If you buy and hold, wouldn't that be "1x"?
/u/sloppysynapses made this point yesterday, but the price action we're seeing aligns with the narrative that buyers keep rushing to catch the falling knife and buy the dip, but they take profit and give up almost immediately.

They want the price to move up, but they want somebody else to do the hard part for them. 

Sellers, on the other hand, have absolutely no problem selling the bounce **and then following through** to continue the decline. 

In short, buyers are impotent and weak and sellers are exhibiting significantly more strength. 
Why would it be a tether pump?
"oversold" is a condition not a signal.
RSI can range below 40 for an extended period of time. When bitcoin trends it regularly sits above 60 or below 40 for long periods of time. Go check out old charts to see it happen. If anything, 40/60 act like ceilings and bottoms for the RSI when it trends down/up 
On the daily, RSI was 20 yesterday --- (the rest deleted).
EOS still has a lot of room to fall *if* BTC continues to go down. There's over 10 million very underwater EOS longs open, although mainnet release hype is also a thing which is likely the reason why they're just hanging in there instead of closing. Will be interesting to see what happens with that when people need to register their EOS ahead of mainnet release, with all those longs open. 
You're right on EOS. I've been studying it's movement since it began crashing. Very large buy orders got filled on the way down.
Agreed, not holding my long long.
>Blockchain company

Good luck in your scam coin
Weren't you one of those frequent posters just a week or so ago? Same condescending tone, just singing a different tune now. 

[**MysteriousBarber**](https://www.reddit.com/user/MysteriousBarber)13 points 9 days ago

Sellers seem impotent. Looks like bears blew their loads failing to assault $9,000 and retreated back to Nouriel Roubini's cave for new FUD.

Fresh **LONG**

BUY @ $9290

Target 1: $9660

Target 2: $9960

Target 3: $10,290

Reevaluation: $9010

\[–\][**MysteriousBarber**](https://www.reddit.com/user/MysteriousBarber)26 points 7 days ago

Long position from $9290 a few days ago converted to cold storage.

There's really no way to lose as a patient bull.
Good luck with your company!
Exit scam ICO is definitely the way to make money right now you are right about that.
Thanks, we will!
Posts like this keep popping up lately. Bear trend confirmed. See you in two weeks about the "it's gonna moon by August". 
This, one does not change the world by watching! You gotta work it!
when ICO?
Scam ICO when?
just curious, do you plan to hold?
This is by far the most insightful comment I've seen on this sub.
Hell ya
Nothing, bots will do it wherever bfx goes
Doesn't matter because of arbitrage. You need to push around Finex or a handful of the higher volume exchanges to make a solid dent. 
I expect red & have placed my first limit buys in the low 7800s. Edit: Moving my limit buys down, as I believe that *IF* we go down, it will be quite sharply down. 
BGD or BRD
> Edit: BGD might be incoming in minutes, if buyers would just hold.

....why exactly?
bro, stop being delusional.  

Don't be happy too early unless BTC goes above 8.2k and holds that line.  
Going from 8k to 8.1k is a joke.
I like how BGD has gone from a $1200/17% 1h candle to a $70/1% candle lol 
I’m buying a little here to add to cold storage 
> what we need is for something like amazon to accept crypto

Retail is dead and getting deader. Merchants don't want the ball ache. Holders don't want to spend. Consumers have zero reason to buy something to buy something. 

It's a sideshow and probably always will be. Even if it isn't it'll be the very last thing to fall into place. 

Q4's 'adoption' was people pursuing more dollars. They'll be back when they believe they can get more dollars again. 
>what we need is for something like amazon to accept crypto

Or just a payment processor who will convert BTC to fiat at checkout. Everyone would accept BTC if they were actually going to receive the fiat equivalent from the payment processor.

Think it can come in two ways, less volatility for more adoption by retailers (or continued steady growth), or speculative hype due to a price increase. I agree that people don't care much about the tech, though blockchain is still a buzzword in corporate environments, but not necessarily crypto's. I think adoption will have to come from Asia as they are more accustomed to using online/mobile payments. If you look at China and the extent to which Wechat pay is used it's incredible. I'd go to makeshift night stalls to get some fried rice made basically on a bike and even there I'd be able to pay with my phone through Wechat. Bitcoin would grow but only after such a social change, and major retailers will make the shift if they see customers demand such use cases. 
8200 is the cutoff where it went real parabolic last year.  It's the last sane-ish not-totally-frenzied price of the previous bull run. 

Not that that really means anything I guess...
Just a little over a month ago people were complaining about the boring $6900 bitcoin. Higher low is my thinking.
yeah it's getting incredibly boring. show me 5 digits or show me < $6k! 
It’s a losing battle to be a long term bear in this market 
All this desperate effort by bulls over the last few months and we’re still at less than 50% of ATH
If 8000 was the bottom of that dump, I think we bust through 10K pretty quickly.  Not convinced it's the bottom though.  We could be in a mini bulltrap at the moment.  Not buying just yet.
I just think it's a self fulfilling prophecy.
It doesn't- confirmation bias. Anyone who believes this or trades on this is trading  on some very weak signals. it'll work until it doesn't and you won't hear anything about it

Someone has done analysis on it before and there's a very weak correlation (if any) 
How do we explain something tyat isn't true? 
1) new money into the ecosystem 2) historically has led to runs 3) everything that has happened before is obviously gonna happen again 4) profit 
Because during the bull run last year they were printing like crazy, and some circumstantial correlations between the issuance and large volume buying on BitFinex fueled the belief that they were purposefully pushing the market up in an inorganic way, ie pumping.  Nothing was ever proven, but Tether purposefully spurring on the bull run was a commonly discussed theory/belief.

So it's basically a self-fulfilling prophecy now, I bet none of the recent BGD buys were from that issuance, but from traders buying into the theory and expecting a pump. So people close shorts, open longs, and perpetuate a BGD on their own. Even if you think it's bullshit or not much to it, it's obvious that much of the community does buy into it, so whattya gonna do - ignore the sentiment shift? Feedback loop.
Grabbing abacus.... 
I know a lot of successful ppl who either have awesome jobs making over 200k or are millionaires (older ppl 50's/60's) and they definitely don't own any crypto, don't understand it, and don't care.  One of the reasons they don't care is cause they already have a lot of money or get paid a lot of money.  Buying a bitcoin means nothing to them, and if they did and it went to 100k they'd just cash out and buy a new car or whatever, but they don't give a shit about the technology or industries it could disrupt or etc. #number of reasons to own it.   I played a gig at the peak of the bull run in december for a huge bank BNY Mellon and at the end i overheard a few ppl talking about bitcoin and i interrupted.  It was like talking to Jamie Dimon or Warren Buffet.  They could give two shits and thought it was going nowhere.   But they also barely understood it and after giving them a 10 minute dialogue about it they couldn't believe i was just a piano player.  They were like wait - what do you do for a living really - not music right? Lol.  
There are plenty of better assets they can hold, including ETH and any other cryptocurrency.   

And if they were going to buy BTC, they already would have.  Everyone knows about it at this point and almost no one cares, (except us).

Also, it's not great insurance to hold money that politicians/bureaucrats can make illegal at any time.
>let’s see how this plays out

more like pays out... amirite???
Where do you consider to be out of the wedge? 8300?
You're really splitting hairs on skipping a $8,120 entry and waiting for a $8,150 entry. 

If you think this is just a technical bounce and it's going to continue lower, then now is just as good a time as any to open a short.
your Positions are 3% apart:))
Yeah it got me too

As my boy thanos says - “I know what it’s like to lose, to feel so desperately that you’re right, yet to fail nonetheless”.
Dead-Cat-Bounce
[deleted]
I seriously don't think so. I'd like you to be right, but the buying pressure doesn't seem to be strong enough and we keep making lower lows. 
One of the most delusional things I've read. 
While I agree beartrap 10.2k by weekly close is ambitious. Lol definitely still time to close it closer to 9k and make a nice hammer though :-)
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
We get it you have a long opened.
This is what I’m predicting
Wow. Do you go down on your mother with that mouth?
Maybe Thomas Lee should create a new indicator like the Bitcoin Misery Index based on shit comments like this that become more and more common whenever the price drops and despair starts to kick in. 
Bitcoin is not a roll of the dice. Buy and hodl is still very much a viable strategy for massive long term gains. Crypto in general is much more a roll of the dice because 99% of the ICOs and alts out there are complete garbage and massively overvalued. But to conflate Bitcoin, which is still on track to disrupt a number of industries and institutions, is dumb af. It's a risky investment with potentially massive upside. Sounds like you are just a buttcoiner or something and don't understand or aren't properly weighting the possible outcomes for Bitcoin. 
You sound like my mother Sir.
Someone just got liquidated? :\)
Calm your bitch ass down.
You're just jealous of me 

also i like how you think we're fuckjng around w £1000...bruh we ain't poor 😂🤣😂🤣
Fancy a bum?
English people and they humour. Priceless!
How about $10,000 deep and still hodling massive gains 🖕🏻
Short at $19.5K ...come back several months later and collect your profits.   Short and hold.
You today:

>You come here sharing tips and analysis of crypto, when it's just a roll of the fucking dice. 

You two days ago:

> clear accumulation, reminds me of the chop at 6k few weeks ago. 
Rule 1
10k by Monday and 100k by Wednesday, easy. 


> sub 8k ~~again~~ in the next 17 minutes. 


Seriously?? It pumped 100 dollars and you are calling the bottom and shouting 10k? I hope you are a troll
that’s all it takes, huh lol 
Time to short then
Dude, you wrote a bunch of stuff such as the gem, "Fuck the Mods". What did you expect?
[deleted]
Can I ask what you said? I love drama. 
Rule 2
The daily candle does not close for 9 more hours
It depends on how it closes, were currently mid day ish so alot can still happen before eod
[deleted]
It is curious to see how BXD (mostly "G") are, apparently, being seen as part of a standard trend or standard pattern. Personally i see them like glitches in a "beta" system (market), glitches due to lack of liquidity which, in turn, is lack of investors/traders/interest. Maybe i'm wrong but i do not remember so much barting in 2017 when all of my friends and their moms had interest in crypto.
Plot twist : it's for eth.
Thanks for the 3 hour delay. 

I’ll call my grandmother for a Tether update next time 
Finex is pumping ETHfinex markets, but still bullish.
Is that what "Grant property tokens" means at the bitfinex wallet monitor?

1:20pm today. Any correlation to price charts?
Shorting local bottoms... uh huh....
How does this guy still have positive karma???
Is this sarcastic? Pretty ridiculous prediction right now if not. It’s like you’re not aware there is a middle ground between ATH moon and complete and utter despair and desolation.
Haha, wow! That's quite the shift in mood. good luck!
I fucking love your posts man, keep them coming. You are becoming an icon for this sub 
Miss your target? Or are you short?

I don't margin trade, but it's one of the reason I set my limit buys at 8000 and 7950. I though there was a decent chance that we would get pushed down to 7800 (and we still may), but didn't want to risk missing a decent entry. Pigs get fat, hogs get slaughtered.
That's not a good reason to keep the position closed though...
I suppose we could switch to discussing the royal wedding.
Shitpost 2.0
sitting here thinking if it’s time to bail on my short

But in all honesty... I am so done with BTC at this point
Omg it would be SO FATAL
Help I’ve fallen and I cant get up!
So are we fatal still?
No, not the poor bears!
Not sure we would be over 10K and the market needs to consolidate after the gianormous ultra gains from the last bullrun finding a price bears and bulls can agree on then onwards
Sure ; but it also needs this battle so that capitulation can finally occur. Catch 22 .
Who’s gonna take this one?
For what it's worth I never told this guy to sell! I even encouraged him to buy below $7.5k I think (because he already wanted to)

I'll never tell anyone here to sell or buy 

Anyway hope you're alright man. Just be patient. Take some time away from bitcoin. it'll be here when you come back
Ugh. 
lmao 
I'm bullish AF, but what's the difference between this and the last 4 fakeouts?
Nice TA dude.

Edit: /s
keep posting these ironically, the price will only turn around when you give up 
“Rude” 
\*yawn\*  This again.

Ironic thing is that CME/CBOE was fuel for explosion in awareness and speculation.
he closed at like $8100 cause he went to make love to his girlfriend
Maybe, too soon to tell. 

If you look closely, you'll see a similar triangle in the Ebay chart (formed by SCLX and ST lows) as we have right now in Bitcoin. The price grinded along support of this triangle for a few days (around end of February, the few candles right above my orange circle), but eventually did fall through. This instigated the panic selling (see increasing sell volume, + large gap between two red candles), and immediate subsequent bounce back into trading range and triangle.

See here:
https://www.dropbox.com/s/egtebl2qpbg8icc/ebay2.jpg?

I'm waiting for a similar bounce (~4.7k - 5.2k) as confirmation of accumulation. Until then, we're just guessing.
> Trends are solid for TA, but eventually we will just hit a number that traders will see as too good to pass up and it will break out of that channel.

Three camps that I can see: 7.9k bottom, 6.9k bottom, and 4k bottom.

7.9k is for people who believe in the buy wall just under 8k. I don't think it will hold. We will know very soon.

6.9k is the level to match the last two bottoms. This is a reasonable point.

4k is the long term trend line prior to the latest bubble. Not sure how likely this is, but it's completely possible, which means buying stuff the other two times will get your investment cut by half. Additionally, people should remember it was 3 years from the 2013 bubble to hit bottom and then slowly recover to previous ATH - 1.1k. Many people here won't want to think about the possibility we could be facing a multiple year recover. And don't want to think about what happens if we face a 2020 market downturn.



> Maybe I'm just reading it wrong.

I don't know that anyone makes TA like I am doing. The issue with standard TA is that all the triangles don't make sense with this current market direction. We read multiple patterns inside of each other. 

What I'm doing is just marking the range the downturn has been operating in, and then when we have multiple bottoms, I copy my bear flag trend line from a previous rung and copy it over to the new lower rung. The angles always seem to mirror the previous ones. Whenever BTC hits the end range, both it and ETH drop. When ETH hits the end of its range, BTC drops with it too. Freaky.

This is basically just monitoring the pattern that has appeared, and it's allowed me to see how far up we can go before the next drop.

Patterns are only useful till they don't hold up anymore. But by tomorrow, this will have held up for 2 weeks.
What's so terrible about those salt mines?
hashtagChewyStrong

Let's make bracelets 
Je suis Chewy.
Perhaps people are just projecting their own emotions onto me? 

I mean, a 20% loss of their trading stack would presumably be a fairly big hit to a lot of people. So they just assume I must also be jilted by the loss. 

In reality it's just another day in chewtoy land. Some days I lose 30% of my stack. Others I make 100%. If I didn't take the 30% losses from time to time, I'd never realize the 100% gains. 

It is what it is.
As /u/justanotherlogin mentioned below, I was expecting a strong drop down to $7,800 followed by some substantial sideways chop between $7,800 and $8,000. 

Seeing a strong push up back above $8,100 (a horizontal area of interest that took quite some time to break down below), is quite surprising. 

I'm actually not seeing it as particularly bullish, since the market is flip-flopping above and below it so much this morning. 

But if the market pushes back above $8,200 and holds that zone, then I'll be even more surprised, but extremely happy.
When he entered he was counting on being underwater for some time, so being here now means he got a better entry than he was expecting.
Ya, if I wasn't holding a long, I might open a short here with stops above $8,300.
Not how I see, we at least have another 24 hours before it encounters any resistance, and that's a weak one. will probably take until Monday for some decisive action. 
Have you seen the insane head and shoulders on ETH’s Chart? 

We’re doomed 

Edit: https://www.tradingview.com/x/t4832CiY/
When do you expect this drop, and how much? I say if it drops, it goes no lower than 7500 over several days, and if it bounces, it could be over 9000 by Monday. What's your prediction?
[deleted]
I always said I thought you and Sloppy got this 100% right
I think I need to copy paste all the insights from you and Haserfuld that I've gotten today.
!short XBTUSD 8220 15x 25%
It might, but I'm just going to add to it unless we break downtrend resistance. This has Bart written all over it right now. 
Position closed with success



* Position: long xbtusd

* Opening value: 8,195.00

* Average value: 8,195.00

* Closing value: 8,220.00

* Leverage: 5.00X

* Stack: 20.00%

* PnL: 0.06%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


Weird movement. Near a picture perfect bull flag faked out sellers (including me) expecting a Bart completion. I usually sleep in Saturday so I may just close here at break even and re-evaluate in the morning. 
> is there any difference between doing 10x leverage with 5% of stack instead of 1x leverage with 50% of stack?

Lower margin/capital requirement and reasonable cap on losses. 
Generally, that type of arrogance comes from being married to a position and it doesn't end well

wow bro...
lol 
>10X? That seems quite a bit higher leverage than you usually trade, or am I confused?

Usually between 5-10x. As my soft stops are closer to 5%, it hasn't been an issue. 
There is, I think it's too late for people to long, I did just above 7900 with stops below 7900 cuz that could get ugly, but still think we have found pretty good support there. 
Me too lol. . thankfully id still be in profit but the ptsd from $6800-8000 is real 
What do you mean? 
Why is ETH a factor now?
Wouldn't be surprised to see 9k.
it’s the little ones to get everybody in short position and thennnnn immortalized on bitmexrektz
Muh seed werds!
> Nice post for long term sentiment but you don't actually detail why fundamentals are strong.

No I don't. The post was running long as it was. I merely enumerated some.

> What is the use case? 

The same as it has ever been: Sovereign wealth representation based on a decentralized consensus. You may want to ask a Greek person that had to wait a whole day at a ATM to get at the money they "own" in the bank if they find utility in such concept.

Merchant adoption, institutional trading they are nice to have, but are not the most fundamental value of crypto and in particular BTC.

> Every attempt to adopt by a merchant has ended in internal arguments and questions that lead to the merchant eventually dropping it. Does this not worry anyone here?

Yes, I do worry. I mentioned Steam and one of the reasons they dropped BTC.

> but it's basically just a nicely wrapped "oh, just wait for institutional investors to jump in. It's going to be huge." with no real foundation to stand on

You got the wrong idea. Likely my bad for the style of writing I used. The main catalyst is trust, not institutions. It just so happens that institutions are the legacy way to signal trust to the general populace. Its the people that need to enter BTC *through* institutions, not the institution itself.

> This whole thing just reads like all those "Here's why I'm bullish on crypto."

Yes, it does. It literally is why about I'm bullish long term on BTC. Why shouldn't it read like that?

Best use case is savings. Limited supply of bitcoin means greater incentive to use it as a store of value or savings/hodling account. Can’t mass create new numbers of bitcoin driving its worth down like you can with fiat.

I’ve started using it for this purpose already as have many others.
> portfolio managers are desperate for a low correlation asset

that's one use case 

edit: it's a pretty huge one too. we'll see if it plays out that way in big way, but I know for a fact that btc is being used for this purpose *right now*

yea the twitter thing is quite funny , they have machine learning , deep learning , whatever learnig and yet they cant fix this BS lol
> but you don't actually detail why fundamentals are strong.

Why do you think that is....because they are not strong.
We'll use it to save money and pay for stuff. Some have been using it this way for years. Once you actually use it, you see why it's so much better. 
I was around when $100 seemed delusional. 1k was so absurd I couldn't even entertain the thought. After crossing 10k I realized we're all pricing btc wrong. Not many people are buying whole coins, they're buying mBTC in this era. An $8 and up to and beyond a $20 mBTC is far within the realm of possibility. And with lighting freeing up micro transactions I have no doubts we'll see $10 uBTC someday.

The arbitrary decimal is the illusion.
Maybe I misunderstand their business model, but don't you find it odd that it is a decentralized platform, with a centralized agency running it who you still pay fees to?  At that point the whole decentralized part sounds more like a marketing gimmick than anything else.
While bisq is decent, i didn't like the layout that much.  I've been shopping around DEXs for awhile and I like blocknet's the best (disclosure: I do own blocknet).  I think they have the most attractive layout I've seen.  They just need to work faster...been in existence since 2014.  Seems to be a true DEX as well and they are working on liquidity options and compatibility with 0x.
Thanks for the kind words! Next time I do this, whenever that is, I intend to come in with a more unbiased point of view. 
Oh, damn, good point with the bull div. I guess I really didn't prepare my TA good enough. I guess it's a learning experience for me.
Seriously, everyone’s talking about having found the bottom while not even 12 hrs ago we were talking about the viability of sub 6k
10k by end of week!
Please stophunt with that trashtalk.
this is tether treasury wallet

https://omniexplorer.info/address/1NTMakcgVwQpMdGxRQnFKyb3G1FAJysSfz

p.s.: their explorer sucks, maybe you should wait a little bit or try a few times before you can see the page with all info.
Probably better than closing, but I'm mobile so I was lucky to get what I did. 
Just in the nick of time holy hell
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtm18

* Opening value: 8,325.00

* Average value: 8,260.00

* Closing value: 8,135.00

* Leverage: 5.00X

* Stack: 75.00%

* PnL: 1.26%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


!long XBTUSD 8195 5x 20%
I think this is the way to go
This seems like the most sensible approach to me. 
I'd probably be out of a position to be honest. Going to cut loose half my position and let the rest ride for a bit
Eth seems to be hitting resistance. If it breaks through i believe BTC will move to 8400, if ETH gets rejected BTC should also drop a bit
No, we'll never go above $8200 ever again. 
bgd?
Conditions are ripening for a BGD within the next 24-48 hours.
8400 would also give us a higher high on the 4H which would also be bullish. 
I could nuance this a lot better but im kinda drunk, it’s a bullish divergence in my opinion and the dips can be neglected. BUT The current market isn’t one that you should blindly follow it. Bullish div on the 4H doesn’t mean more downside. 
I will go to bed now and pray to satoshi that bitfinex won't purchase more tether. I think my stops at 8450 might get hit overnight tho :(. This would also be the point i would flip to a long, since it would mean our recent downtrend line is broken, but too tilted to set an alarm for that and too scared to set a stop buy cause of B.A.R.T.
It didn't, it pumped.
With those that'll make a huge BGD to around $8198

worth it.
those were sent to 1KYiKJEfdJtap9QX2v9BXJMpz2SfU4pgZw. Not printed.
Nope, it pumped.
I think we’ll see sup 10k before we see sub 7k

Can we maybe adopt the following convention in thsi sub:

sub X == <X

sup X == >X

sur X == =X

I shall now be referring to an airplane as a supmarine and a car as a surmarine (this one’s a. it of a stretch)
I don't care about the tech. I'm here for the fiat-money to buy real things. haha
Do whatever you want, i will not judge anymore.

Edit: I'm trading, you are investing. It's okay.
On average, probably 3 to 4 would be my guess. 

As for hours staring at charts, probably an average of 6? 

Although a lot of that time is spent staring at the orderbook and crossing my fingers for open positions. I'm not exactly sitting in some massive situation room constantly drawing and redrawing trend lines every minute of every day. 
Hedge short.

I've been trading 10x in both directions lately. 
If $7,800 breaks down, I see this going down a lot more.
A proper test of support at $7800 seems within reasonable expectations. But this one's more of a Hail Mary, hoping for $7800 to break down.
/u/_chewtoy_ doesn't always stick to his exits, and that's not a bad thing. If the markets giving him signs it's time to exit, he's not going to not exit solely because he previously said he wouldn't. Market conditions change.

And I think he's essentially saying he would've preferred some more consolidation before attempting to really bounce, but because it was so soon and then rejected so fast we're likely headed back down unless things change quick.
There's nothing special about $8,000 aside from the fact that it's a nice round number. 

$8,100, on the other hand, served as strong support all day yesterday and the market is struggling to stay back above it. 

If I think the market is going to reverse course back below $8,000, I'm going to switch positions before it happens if I can. I'm not just going to stare at my screen while it happens. 

This morning I was skeptical that the market would keep pushing up, but it was still in the realm of possibility. Now it's looking less likely, in  my opinion, so I switched positions.
Markets are a dynamic environment, where things change by the minute.
Because the market is fluid and he'll change directions on a dime if he feels that it's warrented? Pro trader in my opinion.

It's pretty common for me to close one position and open an opposing position simultaneously. 

If you're going to close one position, you must have done so for a reason. 

And this isn't really an area where I'm looking to short higher. If it goes much higher, then I'll be looking to reenter my long position.
> Why close the long and then immediately open a short?

Because selling and shorting is the same thing.  If you think the price is going down, you sell/close long/open short.  Cmon man, there isn't anything more basic than that with trading.

> Seems a little greedy to me

Really? 
<T3
There are bitcoinmarket hoodies?
Good idea!
they just printed a bunch of tether, $250,000,000.00 to be precise.
Of course that is completely and fully backed by the same amount of real USD in an unknown bank.
But who cares, let the price action begin.
dyor but tldyor: there’s an exchange that has their own coin ‘tethered’ to the usd, said to be exchangeable for one usd for one coin, known as the USDT. bunch of ‘people’ think they don’t actually have the money for a one to one exchange of all tethers they have printed even though exchanges are making money hand over foot. whenever tether is printed, historically btc has gone up, thought being that new money is coming into the market in the form of tethers. 200 million is printed and then boom a LGD. 

But in general don’t be too lazy do your own research though.

edit- asking questions is totally wonderful though just to be clear. 
[Quite the opposite actually](https://www.anotherbot.info/history.php?user=_chewtoy_), but I appreciate the smug superiority masked as feigned concern. 

EDIT: In case you'd rather not do the math, my last 14 trades combine for +8.8% profit.
[removed]
It does seem he is overtrading but still mostly making money.. which is weird.
Chewy can take the heat, but this is a rule 1 violation.
Don’t be a dick 
was thinking the same. great r/r if ye ready to cut the chute if we get a real bounce 
Not really besides the fact tether just printed.

Pretty good r/r on the short if he bails over 8300
It's not that crazy if we take 4-6 months to get there: https://www.tradingview.com/x/ba0SYymn/  
Here's the disconnect between you and OP. 

He genuinely believes it's impossible. Just as strongly as you might believe it's impossible that you could jump off your roof and spontaneously sprout wings to fly to safety. 

With that mindset, anyone who disagrees IS delusional. Because logically, it's delusional to believe in impossible things. 
Uch, seriously. Look at this shit. Don't even know why we bother.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/Ve3qZLc6/
i too remember the biggest 8h volume candle reversal. Did last month's BGD beat it?
I agree, the further we go below 8k, the more the odds tip in the favour of longs imo. Increasingly DCA towards towards mid to low 7k's is excellent r/r as things are right now. 
You are still short right?
Ehh, Idk. I’ve made some good trades recently where I’m okay with missing out on a trade or two. I work in a hospital so I don’t have to much time to chart read
Yes, I know that people were talking about $6.9k \- and I find it surprising that so many people call the bottom right here \(although I fully understand the Tether point\). As I wrote in previous posts, I am very close to being a bulltard ;\-\) but today doesn't feel like a bottom or a reversal. I called the bottom on May 12 at $8.2k but then it became clear that $9k wouldn't fall, so here we are. Let's see what happens next. And obviously I'd be happy to be wrong given that I am largely perma\-long...

Forgot to mention: Fully agree that it would probably not hit $6.9k due to buy walls
I know that's what the guide says but it just isn't there
Yep or a partial exit and dropping the average entry, so you lock in some profit now, and even if you were wrong and it goes back to your original entry, you can still recover profit on the remainder.
Dammit.... I was hoping you were  joking. At least there's not a BGD immediately after the wick.

I think that's my cue to go to sleep.
Speculation got us to 20k.
Tether aren't printed, they are backed by real fiat. The SEC has been looking into tether since December. If there was something fishy going on we would know about it by now.


Why does everything have to be a trap. Selling is getting weak. 3/6h bull divs took some time to materialize. Anyone with a brain and a bit of patience, able to stomach an additional 5% drop would have longed this. I know I did despite feeling a bit insecure. But already told tou yesterday where I stand. 

Ps a bear trap is a giant green dildo rekting shorts, not the case here, simple supply < demand
lol pumped off a tether print. Than ks for your money budyy.
If we break and hold 8450, it's a little too late and rather pointless calling it a bear trap then, though.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
1 minute after i opened up a short \o/   
edit: oh shit that was a short opening? suddenly i feel bullish.. :/
Longs also shot up the same, so it was a short opening into a margin long opening.
So then you also expect it not to moon, right? 

also we got to $7920. I would classify that as close enough to $7800
I mean it’s all about perspective but I’m treating 7900 as a higher low instead of a lower high until the market proves otherwise. I personally thing buying doesn’t make any sense but this market is irrational at the moment soI’m gonna go with it.
[deleted]
Got any link for that? Thanks in advance.
I just market make... I have to pray a lot, but I can make 0.5% every 10-ish minutes. That’s enough for a tuna sub and a lap dance every day
agree with Sloppy on this one, although I imagine some people saw the news and closed shorts/fomo bought, probably not a huge effect though
Can confirm, was n00b. 
Wise decision.
Interesting. ETH seems to be forming an ascending wedge on the 30m, but neither BTC nor ETH broke through previous support yet. Just wanted to share my observation of the correlation between the two coins for those tracking it.
> but this is a cool move to step up to your actions.

Thanks mate! :)
Put volume on BTC (not on currency) and notice the similarities. Sharp price drop high volume dumps, followed my high volume rallies usually mark the bottom. A period of relative stability usually follows, as people have lost all interest and only enthusiasts remain and people begin accumulating for the next markup.

2014 took FOREVER for that to happen because all EVERYBODY talked about is "bubble cycle bubble cycle bubble cycle. Massive bull run is coming, it's owed to us!" We're seeing that same mindset today, with "experts" saying $50-100k by year's end.

For a hypothetical: if price sharply falls from like 5k to 3k in one high volume giant candle, and strongly rallies back to 6k, the bottom is in.
$2.5K EOY with a rise to $250K by mid 2021
like clockwork lol 
lmao i can't believe this is actually a thing 
Thanks - both. Yeah, I'm trying to resist the urge to revenge trade. 
Bah, even less volatility in the near future then! Tightening ranges and all!

I agree though looks like we'll be chopping in that triangle for a bit, that why I'm still a little hesitant to add here as there's still plenty of downside. 
3 touches in the upper and lower line... 
Definitively influential. 

I hope we don't get that close to the lower trendline, BTC Trendlines rarely hold 4 times from my experience & I dont see support below there. 
mods new flair plz
XRP market cap is significantly worse than people are aware:

First let's look at Bitcoin. We use 16m for market cap because the remaining 5m haven't been mined yet (21m total). The 5m do not have an owner defined. The rate at which coins are mined is known and metered. We can account for the influx of newly generated coins and price accordingly.

With XRP, all 100 billion exist and currently have owners. Just because the owner hasn't offloaded it doesn't mean it doesn't exist. There are some limits attached to the CEO being able to dump his 20 billion xrp, but he can do it and you won't know till it happens. I don't see a difference between ripple holding 42 billion xrp in a company wallet and me holding my eth in my wallet. They both exist even though neither are currently on an exchange.

So my contention is that $3 XRP already had a higher market cap than BTC.

To go further into why this is crazy: Ripple (the company) went through a series B round and got [$55 million dollars](https://www.crunchbase.com/organization/ripple-labs/funding_rounds/funding_rounds_list).

Does anyone honestly think a company that is worth so little would have ownership of something worth billions? And since its just code, they can conjure up multiple versions of XRP, each worth billions more! What amazing technology it must be.

XRP was successful in 2017 for two reasons, it sounded cheap, and people used the word "bank" around it. In reality, it's about as good a play as TRON. There is no reason to hold it, it's value (to hodlers) is arbitrary and irrelevant to XRP's use, and people forget a token isn't stock. There is no profit sharing or anything attached to it.


Yes, it's a joke. A cruel joke on people who buy XRP expecting it to eventually have hundreds of dollars of value.
>Is that really liquid money in the space?

It does not matter, because the chart was always based on the same principles \(XRP was always part of it, although a lot of XRP is in few hands\). 
Who is buying tether? I have yet to see one legit proof of people buying tether with usd. Just hearsay and speculation. 
7800 held like a fucking boss on our run up. Everyone was talking head and shoulders from a 7.8k break down that woulda brought us to the slums of death land but it was tested 3 times and held 
If it holds it will be
Yeah, $7800 won't be a thing. Either a bounce from higher than that, or it busts down, too many people are counting on it being 'the' support. 
If we go past it I think $7600 would be consistent with the support on May 12.
bro, whenever you're in berlin, make sure to send me a pm so we can meet up.  
Or we meet up in Amsterdam one time and chill together.
Except there’s still more longs than shorts open.
thanks , very wise advice , just what i needed since those regrets are killing me , did you have a hard time coping with those regrets? btw the car is lambo right?:\)
Here's to lessons learned.

Better off than I could have been otherwise, but a couple of slightly different decisions away from not ever worrying about money ever again. Oh well.
Yeah pretty much everyone in it for a long time has had many reasons to have lost/spent/traded their coins by now, and back in the most simply wouldn't have thought it sane to plan based on it eventually hitting thousands.
so basically everyone thought it was a joke and sold as soon as they saw 2x\-3x gains 

damn , thanks for the story 
lol 70 cents 
thanks , im in since early 2017 and those prices seem so bizzarre to me now 
You didn't sell yet, we're just waiting on you bud.
[deleted]
Interesting. This time they want the info within 7 days and lenders may have funds out for 30 days already. So not sure how that will work.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
That's where you're wrong. I don't think it will create that big price change but volume could be impacted.
They will kick you out if you dont comply. So many will be leaving/kicked out.
*removes sunglasses*

You’re god damn right
Does a bart mean up or down? I thought it meant both up and down
Hope you're a Jedi. Looking like whoever was jammin it down is outta coins.
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtusd

* Opening value: 8,450.00

* Average value: 8,450.00

* Closing value: 8,311.00

* Leverage: 1.00X

* Stack: 50.00%

* PnL: 1.39%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


idk I kinda like em. endearing. he’s like my repressed inner bullchild that’s probably far closer to how I actually am than my pseudo-intellectual realist bitcorn market trader guy kid thing I pretend to be on the internet
The US government stepping away from financial surveillance via income taxation and instituting a free banking system.
if we go below $6k his world will flip upside down. he'll start posting on his Beta_Bear13 account
lol I think most will. hehe.
Are you saying it from a bear's/bull's viewpoint? Sorry I don't get it otherwise lol.
Yes the daily. Moreover, it will look like classic doji candle reversal. 
I assume you meant 8350, right? In my mind, 9350 would be the MOON today!
I'm mostly concerned about my alts I'm bag holding. 2014 / 15 proved most alts die.
And 90% of alts ceased to exist..
Yeah, but they got it below 8200... 8k just doesnt matter at all
Corrected, thanks Autocorrect 
I would have been more concerned for the sellers if yesterday we were consolidating around $8,100 and they were only able to push the price down sub $8,000 for a few hours.

We consolidated around $8,300 pushing as high as $8,350 for essentially most of yesterday morning and the sellers were able to knock it down nearly $450. 
5x * 2%... That's 10% of your stack.
I’ve made roughly 53% of my trading stack in the last 4 trades.

I definitely have some wiggle room 
Exactly, the only thing to wait for now is more people (money) entering the market than BTC entering. 
i dont disagree, i just think its very difficult to trade
its okay most people here have such superficial understandings of market forces. if anything waning volume with sideways price action means selling is exhausted and it may be the bottom. buyers just aren't interested because of all the choppy movement in the market, theres no confidence. markets kind of at a hault. hopefully 7800-8200 is the new bottom, which would be super bullish medium term considering we formed a higher low.
looks like it bounced 
Shots fired!!
Looks like every Green candle is being wicked down heavily. I am bias since I’m long but I’m not too nervous right now. It’s going to be tough to make any progress here and we will probably go down slightly more , but the contrarian in me is fairly comfortable with my long. 
why then do most people think it does?
like Ethereum or any ICO crypto you mean;  Imaginary money is created out of thin air
Binance is the biggest holder of USDT

Do you think Binance would buy USDT if it were dodgy? 

Binance buys for example 1 million USDT and pays Tether 1 million USDT. Isn't this how it works?

regarding a) .... so is every other crypto that has ICO'd; money created out of thin air

b) USDT can be exchanged for fiat or crypto, so how is it trapped?


Steamed hams but it's Bitcoin
I actually find the kind of sell pressure we've been seeing since breaking below the ~8400-8600 zone rather encouraging. We keep running into significant sell walls on Bitfinex, 100-200 coins are commonly shoving the price down, and on a few occasions, a 1000 coin sell wall appeared briefly. You don't usually show walls like that during what has been mostly a move downwards if you actually *want* to sell coins, you do it to push the price a little lower after you've already opened your short / want to buy coins at a better price. Imo it's only a matter of how low the baddies take us before the next pump starts, but the bottom 'feels' close here, if we didn't hit it already. 
Hahahahaha 
Touché. 
the story on cnbc is the conference was all hype and no substance. 
Well, that's all good and I have no reason to not believe you. But where are all the actually useful applications and usecases involving crypto? 
Normies should already know about his shilling habits.
Haha the amount of times you edit your post, every time I refresh there’s a whole New Testament added. 
Thanks again for the polls , nice idea
Thank you for this comment. Pretty annoying when people say things like this sub is bearish so it means the price will go up.. 
Nah, dude. Updoot for u.
And which direction do bull flags break in 2018...
No, leveraging 1x means you borrow 1:1 on margin. Eg leveraging 10k 1x would mean your position size would be 20k. 10k 2x = 30k
Continuing this narrative; we will need to reach a price, might be 7.2k or even 6.6k where buyers don't immediately sell after the small pump. Presumably this would be because they think the price is now low enough that it isn't going to drop out from under them. 

Would be suggestive of 6.6k, from my point of view. If that falls I think it will be rather chaotic down to something like 3k. This is of course the ultimate bear scenario. We may test something in the 7k's and bounce off hard from there. 
200 million tether was printed today. It was almost proven that BFX was using tether to pump btc multiple times
So what can be derived from it?
When it's below 20, it's a buy signal.
RSI wasn't an accurate indicator when we were falling from $9,000. It was even lower yet we continued the fall. Currently, if I am not wrong, the short-term trend has been bearish all this time (last few days), furthermore it looks like the price doesn't wan't to remain below $8,000 at least as of now.

Given the above context, can we expect a short term retest of $8,400 as also said below? 

Cheers! 
RSI is nowhere near 20 on the daily. What're you looking at? 
It was around the same range when we were falling from $9,000 as said. But that time, conditions were different. There was a lot of sell pressure. 

I am not saying there isn't any sell pressure now, but since last night, it feels like it has been subsiding. I've seen all sorts of sells absorbed quite nicely by the market today, which wasn't the case in the last few days. 
In theory it shouldn't really matter right, since Bitfinex is supporting the mainnet launch and automatically converting the ICO token to the native token. As long as Bitfinex can handle it technically nothing weird should happen.
Agreed.
We got a perfect minimum 33% retracement on EOS, it will take off very soon unless it retraces more... I accumulated it.
[deleted]
May be this is where things took a turn for him and now he has decided to go away? Sad. lol.
Bullish.
Of course some idiot impatient moonboi who thinks the price goes up forever ends up "founding a blockchain company" 


You're confusing "Spend less time on this sub" with, "Don't trade".


Fully stand by the patient bull comments. You'll make far more money holding crypto than selling it in the long run.

Didn't get rekt, nor file for divorce. I've simply been inspired to enrich more than just myself. Not saying that's you--but it was certainly me.

Happy trolling.
It unquestionably has become much, much, much more boring to frequent since it became nothing but leverage. 
6600 to 8100 in a little over a month is a "bear trend." 2000 to 8000 in a year is a "bear trend." You guys crack me up. Bitcoin already hit my moon, overshot it, in fact. Next stop: Mars.
Of course. Cryptocurrency is the future of finance. I've sold fractional Bitcoin a total of 3 times in 5 years of ownership. 
I think the werewolf may have had too many potatoes
dunno the volume is looking pretty decent for this 15 min candle with a bit 150+ market sell, but no major effect on price... We'll have to wait a bit longer. Dunno if we will get a BG/RD either way, I'm expecting more of a MGD/MRD

Edit: Red it is!
[deleted]
especially when 8k was just won back yesterday. 
this is true too... i don’t know what to think anymore.


Something tells me this comment won't age well.
It's what Request Network is trying to do and I'm pretty confident they will success. 
(Not shilling you the project, just giving the information by the way)
I agree. what we need is less software engineers picking boogers in their basements, and trying to redesign the blockchain, and more marketing/promotion out in the real world 
It does mean a lot, there's a reason all the volume is in this range. I know it is kind of meme-y but I do think this will actually be the move that decides where we go from here. $10k+ and it's probably early 2013, sub $7k and it's probably 2014

I mainly say this cause those are the support/resistance levels for the big triangle 

Volume has been tapering off for months, we're nearing the end of the triangle. $8k is pretty close to the center of it...pumps and dumps are both pretty weak, people are getting bored and antsy 
Give me Lambos or give me pre-owned Honda Accords!
Show me the bitcoin < 0, then I’ll be REALLY impressed!
Yeah I agree. Since I've basically become immune to dips (and by that I mean I don't freak out or anything like I did in January), as long as the price is doing something interesting, I will be having fun watching it.
5 digits please!
Actually you have it backwards and it's a losing battle to be a long term bull in this market.  
All this desperate effort by bears over the last few years and we’re still at above 10000000000000% of ATL /S
Ahhahah as messed up as that was, that made me laugh.
And here we see a deranged beartard in its natural habitat.
If the Tether was never printed, we would not be sitting at 8275 right now 
This falls into a weird category for me. I dumped my short in profit and opened long (also in profit), even though I think we're still going to drop. If I hadn't, my short would have been stopped out on this surge. I'm simply hoping to scalp this long, but I got my under 8200, so I'm not exactly eager to cut it here at 0.5% profit. But if I close at breakeven or a small loss, I could end up wanting to re-short and just having a worse entry than I started with. Gah.
> Nothing was ever proven

including Tether never proving they have any of those funds.

tether promised audits then fired the auditor because "auditing cash in a bank account is way too hard"
IMO, we're about to enter the 2nd inning of the BTC phenomenon.

Making BTC illegal is unenforceable & would reinforce the need for BTC. It's code, it's speech. Period.

They tried to enforce torrent illegality. They couldn't. Torrent traffic is 10x easier to control than BTC.
ETH's supply algorithm is crap compared to Bitcoin.  
You're rite.
We shall see, got my stop orders set across the board. 
i'm seeing 2 wedges, smaller one breaks around 8140, the bigger one 8200.

Edit: never mind the 8200 one, was drawing on Kraken but on Bitfinex is completely different
the line of the small wedge is at 8130 USD right now \(with the weired wicks maybe 8160 or so\). If we break out of that one, I think we test the big wedge with the resistance line at 8.4k for the time we would get there.
You're right, and I just missed it. Trading while at work is hard! :(

Edit: added to my short at 8.1
Closer to 2%
They are all DCBs at this point, just of varying sizes.   That doesn't mean that you want to hold a short and let it bounce 20% against you, because if it does somehow get pumped even higher, it's too big of a loss.

So I will take some small losses from these pumps if I have to get out.  This time I just added to my short on that drop and then it got pumped up 2.5% in a few minutes.  So they got me, but not covering any of my short yet.
Look at the chart.  If you don't see the drop followed by the quick $200 rise, then I can't help you.
Nah it broke down from the ascending whatever it was, looked to confirm it as resistance as if it was going to decline, and then suddenly shot up $150
it seems the whole point of his argument is that the dump has significantly lower volume than any previous dumps
Lower lows? Depends on timeframe.
There's more to markets than 'lower lows'. Market dynamics are switching gears.
LOL, have you ever experienced bitcoin pre-2k18?
There were days last year in which the price would go up 15-20% in one day. 

I am not saying that will happen, and I think the current environment does not support that kind of move up, but I would not rule it out.
The answer lies in the daily vwma 365, so yearly vwma. https://www.tradingview.com/x/3UPsFsLV/


Tom Lee makes more shit comments than anyone here. Literally every prediction he makes is wrong, but he keeps making them.
Your mum talks like that?
Lambos for everyone
Ordering my lambo , fuck it getting two!
[deleted]
[deleted]
> I am not shorting/longing   


for a reason
There was not as much barting in 2017, up or down. There was plenty of FOMO up, and plenty of fear driven retraces, but this sharp stepwise pattern with <10 minute candles is new.
I hope so. 
Cool. No need to be a jackass about it. Not everyone is able to get up to the minute updates and reddit every minute of every day while at work. 
how do you guys not know this guy is trolling yet. he is in every single daily swapping between calling for $2k and ATHs. 

I don't even get how it's entertaining for him. There's no subtlety or art to it. It's literally just the same thing over and over 
rude
Please tell me you are kidding...
Neither, Just want a lower price to buy more no specific target in mind.


I realize that many will scoff at this, but my experience of life has taught me that synchronicity is real (ie-the fat finger was perhaps a fortuitous accident)...so i am staying out 
Anyone else think Megan really sucks as Rachel in suits. I mean... worst acting ever!!!

If it wasn’t for Gabriel Macht, that show would have gotten canned after the pilot
Ngl, I'd be pretty intrigued if you started talking about that :P 
What has become of the world if we do?
Please no. I can't believe the rest of the world pay any attention  to this. I don't even know why we have to have it rammed down our thoughts as hard as they are doing. 
I’d short it
Please, anything but the royal fucking wedding. 
what's the royal wedding?


^^^/s
#include <stdio.h>
int main()
{
   // printf() displays the string inside quotation
   printf("Your Failed Retort Is Pathetic");
   return 0;
}
I’m bailing. This is pretty fucking stupid. 

Edit: Still holding 
you are? I am making ridiculous prediction: institutional custodianship will bring us astronomical gains. just hard to say if it will 15x from 3k or 8k 
You need ~~Life~~ Price Alert 
can't believe people here are such c0nts and downvoted me -7 just for expressing an opinion

f%ck this sub
Nope, can't do it, too drunk.
I'll do it. Just give me a sec.
Hey man not looking for a fight.  I only wanted to share that once I let go I was able to look at things a bit more objectively.  Until i sold my last bitcoin that was not possible.  So, i found my truth.  What the hell do i know?  I suspect $8k a coin is a bit expensive at this point in time.  5 years - who the hell knows.
did not mean to rope you into this sloppy.  Bored and having a bit of fun.  truth though i can see a lot of the comments more objectively now that i am not holding.  Admit i can change my tune on a dime though.  cheers all.  just food for thought.  not picking a fight with anybody.
What fake out? We ran from 6400 to 10k very fast. Just because it didn't break doesn't mean fakeout. 
tenks dude!

edit: rude!
Some inspirational remark here. Actually I realized this a few weeks ago. I think it's pretty accurate.
Haha, not sure if worth.
Wow, this is amazing stuff. Thanks for sharing!

After the triangle support broke, it looks like there were so many fake-out movements both upwards and downwards(so many doji candles), and we investors will probably have a tough time discerning "the real bounce" and the true bottom. (5.4k? 5k? 4k?)

While very convincing, this theory does carry opportunity cost / risk of its own, which is BTC may never come down that far :( .. 7200 is a multi-support region with triangle support, 365DMA, 0.786 retracement, etc.. I'm clueless

Btw, does ST stand for Support Test?
6.9 would still be higher than the last bottom by a few hundred bucks.
What do you think about 7650? That's a fib extension and keeps us above the table created by THE bgd, keeping the hope alive for a potential double top
haha, it’s just a joke that people who come out of the woodwork after a regular in here who publicly posts his trades are just salty they didn’t buy Bitcoin at the prices we did.

Hint: It was sub 1k.... waaaayyyy sub 1k
Great community here, I swear. #ChewyStrong
Lots of good stuff on bitcoinmarkets however this may be the best. I actually lol’d.  Alone. Next to my cat. 
You’re the man. Not that you need any encouragement but keep on chewin chew. 
That was supposed to be a joke... 
are you gambling with life changing money? how much money in &#37; do you have in crypto and how much do you have outside of crypto? would be just curious, if you dont want to tell, no problem. ;\)
I'm going to screenshot both your statements just in case it bounces (not saying it will but it's possible)
;)
In what time frame? 
Yeah, I just checked 4H-1W and I don't see anything without mega-squintage. What are we talking, here?
Yes ETH looks bad. I have seen a lot of people here seen linking BTC’s faith to that of ETH (and not the other way) - what is up with that?
I have a bad expectation for ETH on the midterm-long term (because of EOS).
I don’t understand why BTC has to suffer for this, can anyone explain?
You're right and it lines up with your interpretation but I'm not convinced its not a coincidence.
let's check back in 24 hours.
In my trading log excel workbook, I have a whole sheet dedicated to copy pastes from advice from traders here.  And a lot of it is from /u/haserfauld.  Another lot is from /u/jarederaj 

Oh here is one from /u/_chewtoy_ that really helped me:

> My preferred approach is to define a likely narrative for future movement when I enter a position, and then hold my position until that narrative is proven wrong.

I have another sheet dedicated to my thoughts after fuckups.    Here's a gem from the early days:

> DON'T IMPULSIVELY ADD TO A WINNING POSITION AND RISK RUINING IT!  

Edit: oh another:

> no gambly trads, just smart trades


> no bored trades, just smart trades with proper entrance exit plan you dedicate to

I still break that gambly one from time to time... which also breaks the second one, really got me recently actually after having not done it for a long time.
Which downtrend line we talkin' here - at 8.4/5?
Looks more like a slow grind while bots are off, you should maybe have scaled out of your long if feeling unsecured, instead you'll be chasing the price if it keeps going
With this volume trailing off like this I opened a short and take my chances.  I also just noticed that on the pump, the second 30 min candle that was a red doji has 2x the volume than the green candle that got it there.  

I should wait 24 hours or so for a proper test of the resistance line but meh, will instead go with a position half as large as last time and set a stop that I won't mind eating.
For some reason I thought you traded 3x-5x. Good luck! Im expecting down as well, even if it's through 8350 first. 
your cryptowatch username
agreed, my entire mindset with respect to saving has changed since buying btc. I'm 10x more financially responsible than I ever was. not saying this will happen to everyone, just sharing my experience.
portfolio managers are far from desperate.  Goldman Sachs and the others own the markets.  They own everything.  They are not desperate.
Yeah...I really don't get how he can be such a huge proponent of it and leave that shit up. It really shouldn't be that hard to clean that spam up 
Where can I use it to pay for stuff where I and merchants would be incentivized to use it over fiat? 
I never thought we would get anywhere near $10K, much less $20K.  So I must give credit to the delusional holders, although I still think it was manipulation that got it that high and not any kind of fundamentals and organic demand.  But they retired with their lambos and I didn't, so got to give them props.

However buying BTC at $100 and riding it up to $20K and then back down to $100 is not too smart.
Maybe, but you don't have to sign up for anything, and the coin gets delivered directly. I think someone pretty much has to act an intermediary anyway to guarantee that funds are delivered.
nice write up though. 
The only thing more volatile than Bitcoin is this sub's sentiment.
We will never see sub $8000 again.  Never!
It seems that there was a 100M move 2 days ago too. And that had no effect on prices. What could the reason of the move be? Could it be that these funds are used for people withdrawing after the recent verification policy?
With the volume going one? Are you sarcastic or serious?
Our downtrend line isn’t broken and as of right now 8450 is still really far away, so I wouldn’t worry too much if I were you.

About that leverage though.... ;)
If that Tether theory carries any way weight to it, then just for your kind information, 250M Tethers roughly translates to 30,000 BTC at current price. 

Hope you have a good night's sleep! :)
I see, that is why the balance didn't reflected. But the new one surely does. 

It was posted by someone this morning and I still had the tab open. 
What about airplanes that only ever fly above land?
Let me dream. I like to imagine your office [looks like this](http://fousalerts.com/wp-content/uploads/2014/04/60kdesk.jpg)
Orderbooks on which exchange(s) if you don't mind me asking?
You're just commenting here on an hourly basis instead with random predictions, which usually turn out to be incorrect.

Just saying it how it is.
10x all-in with your trading stack?
That would mean the wedge breaks down. Happened before but chances are small. We only went to 6k because there where 40k shorts opened. Shorters are more carefull imo. I can see it go down a bit, but seeing the wicks and wedge I'm going to time a long around 7.9 if we go there.
Imo this could easily bart up a bit.
Precisely.

And I'll happily flip-flop again if the market breaks $8,200 convincingly (even though I said my stops are at $8,300).
!short xbtusd close 8208

Stopped out. Back in BTC, holding for attempt at local downtrend resistance line. Will sell again below 8.1k or if we fail there.
Agree with this. Figured we would've wicked 8.2 at least by now. Cut my long at 8080 and now just holding my short. 
I see some traders on tradingview seeing a falling wedge (i.e. the magnitude of drop is becoming less as well)

I personally don't think 8200 area will be breached easily because we spent so much time consolidating there, but some respected authors looking at falling wedge casts a doubt in my mind
Well to each his own. 

I personally like to take a break from any trade after closing a position because generally I like some new information about the market before making a move.

Anyhow everyone has their own strategy, I just prefer not to act so frequently so that my decisions are measured.

Of course....and one of the traits of a good trader is being able to change your position at any moment, based on market conditions.  I'm not great at that myself, but always working on it.
He said he "closed his long" and then opened a short.

Two separate actions, see his exact response to me.

You should try not to be pedagogic without being sure of the lesson...
Na, we were talking about designs. Check my
oost history, it’s the last post I made
Sorry man, I know what tether is but I didn't know the connection to LGDs. Thanks for explanation. :) 
FWIW, I don't actually think /u/TheEchonomist was trying to be a dick. I've fairly certain there's a bit of translation going on somewhere and many of his posts can come across this way at first glance. 

edit: I could be wrong. 
Yea I thought the same chewy , lately you have been jumping back and forth between positions , not really your style ,
tho it maybe just this crazy market 
Seems like your current trading success rate is only 42%. 6 winning trades out of 14 total.


Rule 4. DM if the report button is insufficient.
It's not overtrading if it's not frenetic emotional moves. People are often afraid of "overtrading" and instead marry their positions. This is just as dangerous. If the market signals change, your position should change. 
Hey jarederaj,

First of all, my apologies. This was in no way intended to be a disrespectful comment. Yet, when I found out that it might have not come up as I wanted it to be, I straightaway apologized to chewy, he apologized too and we resolved it on the spot.

Anyhow, I will take it as a learning curve and will avoid making such comments in this sub altogether in future. I respect this sub, its rules and the community.

Highly appreciate your understanding.

Regards,
TheEchonomist 
I do think his stops are a little too tight.. but I guess on 10x he really doesn't have much room 
Yeah, now that he added his stop it's less ballsy!
I just did some long-term charting and based on previous hype cycles we might see below 5k but it's unexpected, below 4k becomes highly unlikely (would probably be more of a wick), and below 3.5k is flash crash territory. As I currently have it, and we follow the same pattern at the 2014 "crash" then we should bottom out around 4.7k. Of course, this is assuming fundamentals are the same, and I'd personally argue that there is more confidence in the space at the moment, but I can see valid counter-arguments to this too. 

Chart: https://www.tradingview.com/x/jPqVYBxD/
It looks like you have a falling meteor on your chart, there.
The thing with bitcoin is to an extent it rewards delusions, or at least has so far. Not saying it aint worth the money but i guess this is how markets work when you have something like bitcoin publically available.
4H candle move was 3005 to 3670. 4/12 was 6815 to 7770. Percentage-wise it wins.

Not sure on the 8H or the volume profiles. 
Yes.  Already took about 50% of the profits on the short below here, then refilled 25% of the original size back up here.

And I'm also building a long on sept futs.   The long ca is currently at about BE after being started above here, and getting some adds below here. 

I don't care which way we go, I profit no matter what.  (unless we go below 6k, I might have to consider letting the long go there)  Note the long is pretty small still.  The hope is to sell it above 9k, but smaller profits on it are acceptable.  It's a low stress thing.

Edit, btw, this technique was taught to me by /u/haserfauld , we did it in the choppy spot before the BGD.  I ended up actually selling off and recreating the DCA long several times in that chop whenever it looked like we were creeping up, but then looking like we were going to GT.  Paid off well, and becausse of the dca strategy, the final fakeout didn't kill my long.  Conversely, haserfauld had less aggressive dca further than me and it filled less, he did fewer iterations in the chop, but when we finally went up he was motivated to hold it like waaay longer than me (above 9.5k i think) and got a nice one, where as I sold mine of earlier in the 8.2 area since I had higher percentage to lose out on if it went back down.

We are not in bgd territory though.  Not enough shorts, and price descent isn't really stalled.

Fair enough.  Was just trying to get a gauge for the opposing sentiment (to mine).  Congrats on your successful trades, mate!
Go ahead and be a bulltard. It works really well. I'm long from 8500 a few days ago. Think I'm worried? Nah. It's 2 percent of my stack and 2x leverage. I can wait until it turns green.

Forgot to say: the only reason I can afford to do this stress-free is that I've been bullish for a long time. Yeah, Bitcoin is one massive bear trap. I don't even think it's lured in its biggest bear yet.
Oh weird. That’s the way it is on my phone. I’m not really sure. 
Manipulation got us to 20K, with some FOMO speculation thrown in as well.

That's not to say it can't happen again, but will be more difficult for awhile to $20K -> $6K fresh in the memories of many.
I didn't realize my account balance is lower than it was. Oh wait, it's higher. 
His post this morning warning of a bear trap shouldn't have been downvoted. But this post "I called the beartrap" seems like he's saying it's been confirmed, which it has not. 

The more accurate tack would be "This morning I called that this was a bear trap, and it's shaping up to look like I may have been correct."
???

This thinking is the problem with all the bear trap bull trap nonsense. 

The reason it's a trap is because you don't know until after. 

Anyone calling it a trap before the move decisively happens is just an impatient fool. 

This entire move down could be a bear trap. The move from $6800 could be a bull trap. 

The past $50 could be a bear trap. It's all nonsense from noobs who think the next 5 minutes determine the fate of bitcoin 
haha congrats! not out of the woods yet though :) both short and longs spiked, so basically can go either way.. 
If your point is that expecting btc to moon is going with the crowd, then I’d actually question that.

Especially after last couple months people have started to doubt that it’s going to worth 100k or a million, or to hit new ATH.

Anyways, I have no idea how high the price can go, but if you have ever looked at the nasdaq/Dow Jones charts then you can definitely say that everything is possible.
Based on horoscope predictions, perhaps? 
Sorry mate but Bitcoin could change it's direction over a course of minutes if not seconds. With that being said, it invalidates any past post. Especially after considering the level of uncertainty amongst traders.. 
you can always check the blockchain
Yeah, it could be a coincidence or it could be actual people buying cause of it. But all I know is the tether printing is a weak correlation and someone did analysis on it and found that it's not a profitable signal in the long run 
>For a hypothetical: if price sharply falls from like 5k to 3k in one high volume giant candle, and strongly rallies back to 6k, the bottom is in.

Like Feb 5\-7?
sounds about right 
In all sad honesty, is there a way to get an alarm for this bullshit? 
And this “ thing “ is happening right now. 

I think whales just take advantage of it because they know how easily the price of BTC is affected by it so they pump the shit out of it 
I'm expecting this to grind up in the falling wedge to about 8250, and then move down again to 7700, which is the area where I'll look for a reversal, and I'll probably take a long position because the r/r is decent, though this could go all the way to the lower 7k's. If we get all the way there, I'll take a big long position because the r/r is really good as it's the bottom of our big triangle with a profit target of the upper 8k's. It'll take a week or more for it to fully play out though, so it'll be a bit of a waiting game. 
> Bah, even less volatility in the near future then! Tightening ranges and all!

Actually I prefer this.  We can still bounce on this narrower range a few iterations.  And it's clear the decisions to make as we approach the edges.  You can have a plan A that is very profitable, and a plan B that clearly escapes it or flips sides.

But when you are in the middle, and the range is wide, anything can happen.  Plan A and plan B end up being too equal in both probability and in R/R, and you can get chopped up trying to manage it.  And you might have to wait a long time on sidelines to get out of middle before making a move, and by then, it could be too late to be optimal if the next move breaks out.
Im targeting the Monthly Pivot Support, blue S1 line on my chart for a small leveraged long.  Will increase leverage as/if confidence increases.  If S1 fails I expect the lower trend line to fail too.  The next 2 MPS aren't shown on the chart.  But they sit at around 5100 and 3850. I'll have buys staggered all the way down to there!

EDIT: Chart: https://www.tradingview.com/x/4gMRAKHB/

Note: The pivot points will change as we enter into June.  
Even worse, your XRP can be frozen any time the central authorities feel like it.
I'm so happy I sold at $2.8x
No its not because new alts are added all the time...no?

You could have 100 extremely illiquid alts that add up to the market cap of bitcoin but they have nowhere near the same cumulative liquidity. 
People who prefer to remain anonymous I would guess.

digga, ich war gerade in Berlin... vor so 3 Wochen.

Ich gehe jetzt nach Portugal und komme dann auf jedzen! Amsterdam hört sich aber fast geiler an :)
This near-always holds true.
yes but this might change in the comping days -  we will see :)
Sometimes I think about my mistakes and they bother me (cryptsy collapse hurt... i had soo many fuckin ripples..) but overall im just happy with what i made out with. Main lesson from my example is trust no one and be very carefull with all the schemes in crypto land.. its ok to have some coins on am exchange as a trade stack but definatly have some cold storage.. dont put all your eggs in one basket so to speak..

As for my car sadly it is not a lambo. Its a toyota Corolla haha. Not nearly as ballin i admit, but having a reliable car that is good on gas with no payments is amazing.
Makes you sick doesn't it?
No. I sell when we pass the 12K
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Well it works very badly for the lenders with funds lent for longer timeframes than the deadline to comply. It's good for people to realize the risks of lending and why the rates are high because apparently the hack wasn't enough.
I was talking about the email they sent in December to unverified accounts that emphasized US individuals (also with VPN/proxy/etc) cannot use them. My point was that if people leave (not just US in this case), some funding might actually also leave.
People can withdraw, open a new account, and trade without giving tax info.
I think they will withdraw and then create a new account. Problem solved until next year.
I don't know, even if it was a laddered descent I would've expected it to have snowballed already a bit by now. 

I'm looking at the 4h bullish div. I think a whale might want to poop on everyone's shorting party and just dick around with a bart. 

undeniably the trend is down, though bear seems a little confident in my opinion. 
Big spike up (4pm) followed by small ups and downs then a big ole dump 
Up and down or down and up
Haha I’m just messing around with him. 
You will never be bearish then :)
Dude, it's not even the government. It's your bank pimping out your data and charging merchants absurd fees. Oh, and printing money from their bungholes every time somebody takes a loan. Not saying the government is good, but at least it's supposedly democratic. Banks are straight-up fascist slave drivers.
Was support, now turned into resistance to the increase.
Haha yes, 8350
lol... my bad

EDIT: I stood in a corner and thought about what I’d done and came to the conclusion that since I always trade 10x, 2.5% * 10 is 25% and instead of doing half that I doubled it. I feel less stupid now
Don't think about it like that. That's how you lose all your stack. Every trade should stand on its own merits, the risk/reward needs to be worth it. Be patient or you will lose all your profits quickly. 

Hard part is keeping profits, not making them 
aka House Money Effect, popularized by the nobel prize winner for behavioral finance, richard thaler.

https://www.investopedia.com/terms/h/house-money-effect.asp

As long as you know what you're doing (you sound like you do) then the gains and losses are acceptable, good luck :)
This is how I made back half the stack I lost and then lost half of those same gains the next day lol. But I won't lie, I still play it risky. 
If I was a holder in fiat, I'd feel uncomfortable rn.
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Still soon to say, watching $691 and $685 more or less.
The one hitting should tell the direction of the break.
yea but it looks like genuine selling, shorts have gone sideways for quite a while now. 

As long as you're long from like, sub $8100 you don't have to worry much for a bit

Why did people think Chinese New Year would affect the price? 
edit: Contribution self-removed due to over-zealous moderation. 31 day ban for single use of a benign word with 10 upvotes of communities agreeance. Unlike the army of trolls who evade these bans I will not be contributing any further. Race to the bottom.
Nope, exchanges don't create ETH out of thin air and use it to buy BTC or ETH.   They also don't claim that is it backed by USD in a bank account.
I don’t know for sure, but I don’t think so. Binance doesn’t have USD pairs, only USDT pairs. Am I right in remembering they do not accept USD deposits, either? I think you must transfer in/out only in crypto. Therefore, no ISD in their system at all if that is the case.
Binance has usd deposits? That's the point though. It can only by exhanged for crupto so the original usd never leaves.
Binance doesn't purchase USDT, it just makes it available for users to trade with.  I believe that it was Kraken that said if Tether were to collapse, it wouldn't directly impact the exchanges, just the users.  Now obviously it would have an indirect impact if prices crash or there is a mass exodus from crypto trading, but that's a different point.
Like how the bottom "felt close" at $16k, $14k, $12k, $10k and now $8k right?
I don’t know what to make of it myself, but it doesn’t seem natural to me.
I don't think there's any evidence that the bottom is close. All the previous bottoms have been hard dumps and then a very strong green candle which signifies the bottom. We're not seeing that.
Blockchain is finding a lot of use cases in industry in the supply chain.

Usecases for crypto is a bit different.  I think Bitcoin is working fantastic as a decentralized store of value.  Digital gold 2.0 if you will.  A stateless digital cash not controlled by a central bank or large institution.  I think it is likely that "crypto" will find other use cases, but I don't see any others with much traction as far as real world application at this point.
I once commented on his post making a joke about a “ small 9 Word phrase “ that changed my opinion.

Came back 5 minutes later to find a paragraph and multiple people commenting if i was mentally ok 
lol I know I should probably just finish it before hitting submit. 
sideways.
On CEX, for instance, 1:2 leverage means your margin would be 10K, and position size 20K. 1:3 = 30K. There is no 1:1 leverage option for margin trading, because that would be the same as buying and holding. (don't margin trade on CEX, btw).
> It was almost proven that BFX was using tether to pump btc multiple times

Or you know, price goes up after a large amount of money enters the market. There's definitely correlation between new tethers and price moving up, but to say that it's "almost proven" that it is BFX using tether to pump BTC based off that is some Bitfinexed level tinfoil. 
You'll never now. Could be for bch that's bouncing hard, could be for an eos mainnet pump, could be for shorting btc... Who knows. 
Do you realize that Tether is not actually used in Bitfinex? The pumps on Bitfinex don't need Tether, the traders there use actual fiat. Tether is only needed to fund USDT exchanges that have no fiat markets. So if you see a pump on Binance for example, then you can say it's a Tether pump.
Can you explain what you mean by almost proven?
When RSI is under 20 you have extreme market weakness. Price on any time frame can continue going down even at the RSI 20 level. The buy signal is when it goes back above 20 with other conditions. Oversold is a condition- not a signal.
Sort of, it depends on which time frame and on what leverage. There are a ton of times where you could've been burned by holding a long for too long after entering at 20 RSI. 
You can be at 20 on RSI and price still goes down on any RSI time frame, the buy signal is when it returns back above 20.
8400 is too high, I don't see it challenging the downtrend until it's at 8350 or lower towards 8200. 

tl:dr -- it can, but it's ~~highly~~ unlikely given the current price action. 

Chart: https://www.tradingview.com/x/yF6eMOOt/
Yeah that’s why I think RSI is more useful in finding divergences than anything else. 
its 39

Which is like 19 away from 20. How close do you need it to be /s
I used [cryptocompare](https://imgur.com/a/SkK7iuZ), on a 6 months chart, one candle per day, RSI14. But I see that the chart looks different on bitstamp. Cut me some slack, I'm new to this.
I wonder too. lol. 
Is a straight up token swap on exchanges like that going to be possible, though? Tokens held in wallets won't automatically be converted, people with their EOS on MEW or the likes have to 'register' them somewhere, and there's been talks about possible KYC requirements, too. Have to say I'm not particularly into EOS so unsure of details, but I thought there's a good chance things will be a bit more complicated than usual for this token swap. 
Sounds like he's going to change the world then.
!RemindMe 1 year.

It'll be such a pleasure rubbing your face in the shit you just laid.
A lot of words to say you made some bad trades and are rage quitting.

But yeah okay, I’ll play along, congratulations on your sudden enlightenment to help society with whatever scam you’re hoping to launch.
If you're going to cherry pick your data points, why not just say, "$6,800 to $7,800 in a little over an hour?" 

Seems odd to celebrate moving from $6,600 to $8,100 (a $1,500, 22% rise) when the market has also dropped from $10,000 to $8,100 (a $1,900, 19% drop) in the timeframe you're referencing. 
A fake out again... Oh well.
Just B is possible for now, no M.  For example for it to be green M we are lacking most of the checklist:

* local bottom: check
* the btcshorts chart is climbing up to make a mountain peak (local is enough as long as the recent climb ends up being fairly parabolic)
* shorts continue to open, and at a rate greater than longs, but price keeps going in a sideways fakeout battle and not finding new lows
* a loss of premium on futures
* RSI oversold on all time frames
This is a good article to counter merchant adoption necessity.

https://nakamotoinstitute.org/mempool/im-hoarding-bitcoins-and-no-you-cant-have-any/
Even if BTC could scale to a trillion transactions per second, it's still possible that it'll be worth more in a month so most will look for other money to spend. 

I wouldn't get uptight about anything relating to retail or 'adoption'. That's an area rarely if ever mentioned by anyone with a decent grasp on things. 
To be fair, that's why I'm interested in the whole facebook potentially developing their own crypto. Though it would be centralized and not a real development to blockchain tech in itself, they can rapidly integrate it into WhatsApp, from which use cases and adoption would amplify almost instantly. 

Good to see at least my observation isn't just me then.

> this will actually be the move

I dunno, we can still bounce off the bottom and ultimately break up, or the inverse.  But I agree that the final breakout direction is going to be the key moment.  And agree that an upward break now will lead to an extended bear market because it'll add an additional near term correction.

Hahahahaha
lol.
So you're initiated now.  Welcome to the club.  Next step: learn to buy the dip.
> as long as the price is doing something interesting, I will be having fun watching it.

That's the point. Nobody likes watching price stuck to certain numerical  without moving up or down. :)
Great choice, sir!
Sorry dude but you have no understanding about bitcoin.  The bulls will win this in the long run.  The math is not in the bears’ favor. 
same thing can be said about yesterdays mex shitshow
Wrong. Rsi, mfi, macd was telling it on longer timeframes. Learn about it.
I tell you my experience, I said something similar last month about whales and exchanges, I broke all resistance lines of downvotes. :)
What makes you think the Tether was used to long? It could just as easily have been used to short. 
This why for me the only way to play is to stick with whatever your own analysis tells you...to me the charts on longer timeframes are bearish so I am trading accordingly.

These algos will chop you to hell, so I am taking shorts when i like the entry and i will exit with discipline or use stops if i can't watch the action

peace
Making BTC illegal is enforceable and is being enforced in China and India very well.   Yes it does reinforce the need for it, but doesn't help demand in the face of imprisonment.

> , it's speech. Period.

And hate speech is illegal in some places.  And it's enforced quite well.
That's great.  And ETH has been a better investment over the past 12 months and 2 years and 3 years.
>mind the 8200 one

depends also how you would draw it on bitfinex, it might be 8.35k or so...
Gotcha, didn't know which wedge you were referring too. Thanks!
It happens, I've fallen under the same spell too.

The worst is when I've blown through DCA reserves just to lower an entry by $50 to obsessively put it in a specific place on the chart.
Huh. That's true, actually.
Yes that is true. 
PSA: Reddit is not your father's Internet, unfortunately. 
 Nice
I really wish he would just stop. It’s so annoying
I don't even need to read the user name to know who it is.
My initial thought was that he was, hence my “is this sarcastic” question. It can be hard to tell in crypto tho because sentiment swings so rapidly and people’s positions become so polarised.
Doesn't sound like a very good plan. Speaking from experience, you should always do your own analysis and set a target and stick with it. If your target is off, and the price moves away from you, make a new plan and learn from your mistake. And above all, have patience. The price (especially with Bitcoin and other cryptos) will eventually come back to you.
Fair enough, but if it doesn't work out for you, remember it for next time.

I've found the same thing as you, but I've also found that that sentiment gets reinforced with confirmation bias.
Looks like it worked out for you after all! :)
Thought I was on Facebook for a minute lol
Oh Carol... Why would you ever say such a thing? Are we still meeting for Bible study and a glass of white wine on Saturday night? 

Love,

Sussie 
Man whatever you’re doing, just stop. 
I got stopped out at break even, didn't cover the fees though. 
I agree. I’m just pissed about the barts
Haha this confirms you’re 100% American 

(Okay maybe 95%)
Nice hop on the bandwagon
Haha, no worries man! No ones looking for a fight. Though your post is both inquisitive and provocative. I don’t really know what answer you’re seeking. What you do with your bitcoin is up to you, and nobody here is out to give someone else financial advice. 

If you post you want to Sell you cold storage here for x,y,z cool! I’d love to hear the reasoning as to why, and what you think the future prospects for the market are. 

You comment already has much more nuance then your initial post, but my question remains, what are you looking for in your question? 
That's known as confirmation bias. Anyone who buys coins will have an upward bias and anyone who sold coins will have a downward bias. Objectivity does not exist in financial markets.
Unfortunately it sometimes takes being flat/selling to see things clearly. 

You're now just hoping price goes down so you don't miss out. Which is reasonable, but keep in mind that you will be more profitable and happier in the long run if you swap those cause and effects around. 

Sell because you're bearish, don't be bearish cause you sold 
There have been plenty of 2-300$ movements like this in between and people thought that was it, and it wasn't, just like this time around.
Your commitment to your role is inspiring and really irritating at the same time 
I told him if he had just left it open with the monitor on he could've blammed while the price dumped and it'd be glorious smh
ST = secondary test

The doji candles are probably accumulation on a micro scale, those 7 or so candles under the trading range look like a miniature version of the entire accumulation trading range.

Also, don't worry about catching the absolute bottom. You'll know it was the real bounce if we do move back into the trading range. And if we never go down that far, you can always buy when 7200 confirms as solid support.
It won't happen today, so I'm looking about where it will fall at a future date:

https://www.tradingview.com/x/HCTijY0t/

Since we will have a few climbs along with the dips, it might actually be in the 7k range instead. Won't know till we get there.
LOL. Ancient history that is. I feel bad for anyone that is the target of the that bot though
Oh I know, it just gave me an opportunity to expand on why I'm not sweating a small loss.
I prefer to stick with %s instead of firm $ or btc amounts when discussing my trades.

Because honestly, it should't matter whether I'm trading with $100 or $1mm.

It's exciting for some people to know that somebody who frequents the sub is slinging around multi-million positions, but just because somebody has a lot of money or btc doesn't necessarily make them a good trader. Nor does having only a little bit of money or btc make somebody a bad trader.

EDIT: I kind of sidestepped your question. Let me put it this way: if I lost all my btc, I'd live a normal, happy life with my family. There'd be lots of love, but no lambos. 

lol in my city the average montly salary is like 500$ so for me he is def gambling with life chaning money :\)
I’m not saying it’s going to break down, i don’t follow eth. But if it does, rip
Daily timeframe
4H
https://www.tradingview.com/x/t4832CiY/

MAXIMUM PAIN 
>  (because of EOS)

Why?
[deleted]
I'm gonna start doing this right now.

And that last one lol! I learned that one myself the hard way. 
Yes. That should roughly be where it is. 8400ish is what I'm thinking, but I'm away from charts 
Currently right on 8400: https://www.tradingview.com/x/r3qvbOCv/
Do the bots go off often? I been watching price action daily for the past three months and don't remember this obvious of a scale down of bot volume
That's essentially where I am as well. Good luck us.
Why?? I'm confused why you would need or want that. i don't even know what it is 
I think it will. Gradually once the masses realise this, 21 million btc will seem like an awfully small amount and the price will eventually skyrocket. A great investment, imo, if you’re willing to wait 5 or
more years.
They are very interested in the tech and the future potential of crypto's. They're not snubbing it like most people here seem to think. 
Desparate might be strong, but they are definitely working very very hard at this. 

The search cost for low correlation assets is very very high. I don't know if crypto is it, but the funds that are able to find low correlation assets gain AUM exponentially and the incentive to be part of that is high.

Maybe he just doesn't care 
And basically right now for someone to use it they are incurring the fees that are normally paid by the seller.
Merchant fees are roughly 1%-5% to let buyers use their credit card conveniently.  If you pay off your card every month you are accessing a giant database with $100s of millions in infrastructure for free (of course the company still makes money because of those using the loan aspect and through merchant fees).

Now enter bitcoin, the seller saves 5% from selling item X but doesn't pass that savings to the customer, instead the buyer now has to go out and buy bitcoin to go buy X and pay a fee, at a minimum of 1% up to 10% to buy the bitcoin.

2nd layer solutions can hopefully make this process easier and cheaper. 
Do you really not know the answers to the questions you are asking today?  I don't mind answering them, but generally the big picture stuff about why Bitcoin is unique and revolutionary shouldn't need to be covered over and over in the daily discussion.  I don't mind answering sincere questions from new people, but I really think you must know the answers to some of these "devil's advocate" type questions.

Anyway, four examples for me personally:

1. Poker sites.  With fiat I had to go to Moneygram (or Western Union or similar) - Mastercard and/or Visa won't work - pay a fee, wait awhile for someone to pick up the money, pay a fee to the site, then see my deposit available for play.  To collect from the sites I would get a check from a foreign bank, usually weeks after I requested deposit, which would then usually be held for about 10 days by my bank. With Bitcoin, money on and off with almost no fee (just the transaction fee) within 10 to 30 minutes in most cases.  It is an enormous improvement.

2. Transferring money internationally.  For example moving money to Exchanges not located in my country (the US).  Moving Fiat costs often over $100 in fees and usually takes a day, sometimes several days.  BTC is usually less than one hour and I think the highest fee I have ever paid was maybe $20.... I often overpay to get fast confirmation, and usually the fees are less than $5 and very often under $1.

3. Purchases of precious metals from online merchants: the merchant fee for using bitcoin was 1% instead of 2.5% for using a credit card.  Obvious benefit both ways on those purchases.

4. My initial lightning transactions were 0 fee and instantaneous.  I think it's pretty obvious that as that network continues to grow you will see advantages over using fiat for small transactions.

Obviously Bitcoin isn't really usefull for day to day purchases for people who have great access to the existing financial infrastructure.  It is equally obvious that there are a TON of transactions that it can facilitate with significant advantages for less typical transactions and for people who don't have great access to the legacy financial infrastructure.  Even where using Bitcoin makes great sense, adoption is still very low.  It is extremely early, but I think you would need to be willfully blind not to see the potential.
Dude! Do you not realize that Bitcoin and any crypto does exactly that?

Thenn throw in some smart contracts...

I’m sure we can develop a volatility stock for that.
there was an increase just after the 100m move 2 days ago (if the timestamps omniexplorer and gdax line up). is there a way to get alerts from omniexplorer?
Bitfinex is using them to prop up the price, without tether Bitcoin would have hit 6K already. No effect on prices ? after they moved 200 million usdt today the price jumped 200 dollars.
Totally serious. Better ditch this rat poison before its too late so you've got some capital to get started with baby brain trading. 
supterrain
Sweet pic.  I had 8 monitors on my computer back when I traded stocks.  But not big stacks of cash, unfortunately.
Bitstamp and Bitmex usually. 

Bitmex is generally the most helpful for me. Mostly because that's where I trade.
Then block me and move on with your life? I don't really know what else to tell you.
Yup.

My trading stack is 10% of my cold storage.

So these days I'm effectively either 100% in fiat when I'm shorting or 2x when I'm opening a long.
Big Green Dildo up to $7,800 from $6,800

Big Red Dildo down to $6,800 from $7,800. 

The market does love symmetry, after all. 
Hm, conversely, we only managed to get to $8k and stay there because 15k shorts closed. 


It definitely could.

When I opened my position, my expectation was for an immediate drop, which never really materialized. 

Buyers really just need to push convincingly back above $8,100 to set things in motion. Although they're stalling at the moment.
But...but...you promised! You're not allowed to deviate from strategy in a fluid market!
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtusd

* Opening value: 8,025.00

* Average value: 8,025.00

* Closing value: 8,208.00

* Leverage: 1.00X

* Stack: 100.00%

* PnL: -2.53%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


!long xbtusd 8208 1X 100%
Personally, I see a descending channel with a false breakdown: 

https://imgur.com/a/3cHzZuk

As a parallel channel, it doesn't carry the inherent bullish bias that a falling wedge does. 


You do you man.

But I disagree with the characterization that it's greedy or manic to close a position and open an opposing one at the same time.
Of course it's technically two separate actions.  It can be done with one order on some exchanges, but doesn't matter.


speaking of which i saw a tweet that said something to the effect of

'i was warned not to open up mex indoors'

https://pbs.twimg.com/media/DTxpJ-HWAAAE7a6.jpg

Ya, it seems he was trying to be a dick.
That's precisely my style, and has been for ages. 

I catch a lot of flack for it, but what people struggle so much to understand is the fact that I flip-flop constantly is precisely why I'm profitable in the long term. 

In the past 24 hours I:

Shorted at $8,230

Closed at $8,000

Longed at $7,950 

Closed at $8,090

Shorted at $8,090

Cosed at $8,214

Sure, I could have just held my short from $8,230 and still be holding it. But I'd be underwater on that trade as well. 

I move around a lot. I take small losses a lot. And I take big wins from time to time. 

Over time, the big wins make up for the small losses. 
I'm simply not going to have the debate of why a trade that yields 7.78% profit is more important than one that yields a .25% loss.
Google "weighted average" 
3.5K in May would be flash crash, but if we got there in the fall it wouldn't be that severe. Still, I'm not a huge believer that we'll go that low. I think your 4.7K bottom is significantly more probable if we continue downward. An early July bounce off the old log resistance line to confirm support coinciding with a drop below 5K causing a nice V reversal. I think that's a higher probability than new highs before new lows, personally. 
lol give it 2 weeks, it may be just that
I'm still holding my short as well--just barely missed my first profit target. I also have a scaling long started. It's only 5% of the account so far, but it caught pretty near the local bottom.
That DCA strategy for longs is a very smart play. I think I'm gonna start keeping some ammo if we go back down.

Appreciate the in depth comment.
How much do you and /u/haserfauld were allocating for that DCA long? About 30% 5X at it's peak? That was a killer strategy specially with futures in backwardation.
I am also very comfortable being a permabull, especially given the tax implications of being a long-term holder (tax free) vs a trader (income tax) in my home country ;-)
>	Manipulation got us to 20K

Citation needed.
Then it's all good! but membah that news is just an excuse for volatility, not the other way around.
But people always tell me the next five minutes are critical??!?!
yee trading this shit is like playing russian roulette nowadays
I think 99% of people who own crypto expect it to moon eventually again. I imagine there's a very, very small subset of people who only hold it to trade or for shorter term gains. 
[deleted]
Or, is it the people closing their shorts, fearing a price increase, that cause the price to increase?
Sounds like a good plan. [Area to watch for a possible breakout.](https://imgur.com/a/zgDzgiN) I was also waiting for 7800, but it seems to be taking some time. 
It's touching your limit now.
market cap means nothing... nothing at all

24 hour volume is the only metric I ever look at
The alts that are added are peanuts. The Top100 have most of the mcap, the rest is not relevant even for that chart. 
Dude do you speak like 4+ languages or are you using a translator?
There was like 40k shorts and 20k longs when we exploded...so definitely not true then 
Yes it could.  Keep an eye on the shorts chart and wait for a mountain peak.  It doesn't matter if they outnumber longs or not, its about their growth.  And if they have rapid growth to a new local high while the price still does not manage to break it's local low.
I heard he's still holding that short.
Hmm yeah sure. Because you think that won't be spotted and going against the TOS risking a freezed account. I don't think so.
How do you know this works?
I have no clue man... it just all seems so artificial

Down and up would be a strayan Bart
Precisely. That's why I'm full bulltard.
Well, but it's the government giving them the power to print money and it's the government stopping potential competitors coming in and undercutting those disgusting  fees.
Ahh, my gut feeling tells me this support turned resistance wouldn't be that big of a problem. However, I am not expecting any further upward increase in the price before the daily close. Yet, fingers crossed. 
>Hard part is keeping profits, not making them

This is what I'm learning.  If it was paper money I'd be way ahead, but somehow I have a knack for turning winners into losers and losers into big losers.  I just suck at keeping to my plan.  Instead of closing out a winning position I keep FOMOing that this could be "the one" and hold it too long, then the market changes, then I hold it too far in the red.

I guess knowing is half the battle, I'm going to work on improving my discipline on this.
I guess this shows why I’m such a terrible gambler. I’ll win 500$ in roulette after making 20$ bets all night, then start making 100$ bets to try and win $5000.

On that note, I’m going to reduce my position size by 25% because my risk management is terrible. 
It’s more fun playing it risky, because when you win it big it’s such a thrill.

But when you lose it big, fuck. 
I longed when bitmex got back up at an entry of 7980. But we will see I don’t set stops thesedays because of these wicks but at least this gives me some sleeping roomed 
Because of the 红包 moolah
> Binance doesn't purchase USDT

so they get it for free? C'mon
No since the price range did not bounce as much then 
For sure, since as you can see from my post history, I've done nothing but claim that the bottom is close every day on the way from $20000.

Oh, wait...
I believe BTC hit 5900 during the first dip, do you think it could go lower ? From all previous crashes it never did a lower low after the first dip
> All the previous bottoms have been hard dumps and then a very strong green candle which signifies the bottom.

Look again at early April.
hahahahahahaha. and I'm writing this on my phone. I type even faster...like 130-140wpm. can hit up to 170-200 sometimes when I'm on fire! 
Nope its cool, makes refreshing worth it!
A good idea is to write your post on a word file first, then its just Ctrl C and Ctrl V. ;)
You downvoted me? Please do a simple Google search and learn. X1 is not the same as 1:1
There is actually no correlation, I did the math and looked at different studies and there is no real
Correlation even if you add a lag of a couple of days between price of btc and day of print 
Large amount of money with no audit and shady business practices? What the difference between me buying 200 MM in BTC and me buying 200MM in BTC with pretend money? Im still pumping the price and thats all i meant with my comment because they actually are pumping btc with it . I never said they manipulate or that they use it to do some shady stuff.
Yeah OK. Shoulda specified.
Yeah right, $8,400 is quite distant and we have some barriers to overcome first if we're to go in that direction. A daily close above $8,200 could be favorable perhaps?!
This is what I was looking for, YES! This could be a very possible outcome of RSI in times like this.
dont worry, we’re just playing... it’s all in good fun
It is 39 on Bitfinex as also highlighted below. 
Hah, sorry. no worries 
There is no KYC for EOS registration, registration is a bit of a big word because it is simply linking your EOS keypair to your ETH keypair so that when the mainnet launches you have an EOS address with just as many EOS as you had on your ETH address. The ETH-based EOS, which is an ERC-20 token, will be frozen (and thus useless/worthless) after mainnet launch. So the only issue is that Bitfinex has to register all of the EOS addresses in their wallet before the launch, which probably means they have to shut down EOS deposits/withdrawals for some time.
genuinely excited my friend
I will be messaging you on [**2019-05-19 01:13:43 UTC**](http://www.wolframalpha.com/input/?i=2019-05-19 01:13:43 UTC To Local Time) to remind you of [**this link.**](https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8kae50/daily_discussion_friday_may_18_2018/)

[**CLICK THIS LINK**](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[https://www.reddit.com/r/BitcoinMarkets/comments/8kae50/daily_discussion_friday_may_18_2018/]%0A%0ARemindMe!  1 year.) to send a PM to also be reminded and to reduce spam.

^(Parent commenter can ) [^(delete this message to hide from others.)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Delete Comment&message=Delete! dz7tl6j)

_____

|[^(FAQs)](http://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/24duzp/remindmebot_info/)|[^(Custom)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=Reminder&message=[LINK INSIDE SQUARE BRACKETS else default to FAQs]%0A%0ANOTE: Don't forget to add the time options after the command.%0A%0ARemindMe!)|[^(Your Reminders)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBot&subject=List Of Reminders&message=MyReminders!)|[^(Feedback)](http://np.reddit.com/message/compose/?to=RemindMeBotWrangler&subject=Feedback)|[^(Code)](https://github.com/SIlver--/remindmebot-reddit)|[^(Browser Extensions)](https://np.reddit.com/r/RemindMeBot/comments/4kldad/remindmebot_extensions/)
|-|-|-|-|-|-|
Pshaw, logic. There's no logic on mars! He had to go through space to get to Mars, and space is a vacuum, void of everything (including logic!)
meh, too early to say, its looking a bit heavy so we might drop a bit more. Think this was enough to spread the bbands a bit again ever so slightly. probably won't see anything drastic until we get tight on higher timeframes. 
oh I mean M as in medium. I can see how that's confusing though, haha. I agree that it's definitely **not** going to be a mega dildo
I disagree with this line of logic; everything I own is in btc and I'm selling frequently to keep a debit card that I micromanage. If I didn't have to micromanage I wouldn't.

You just need enough idealists and to keep the barriers down and merchant adoption will happen simply because I need to eat.
my issue is... those with a deep grasp of things are excellent coders but shitty economists
all ships rise with the tide
Great, so now in addition to knowing everything about you, Facebook controls your money and has total visibility over hwo you spend it. Pass.
Well yes. I will *officially* be convinced at $6k and $12k. but I believe that sub $7k and $10k+ will probably signal both of those moves earlier. 
I've been longing for it sir! :)
Tell that to people in China and India...and everywhere else.  Math doesn't have anything to do with it.  Sorry but you have no understanding about bitcoin.
Definitely a contributing factor, but as soon as Tether printed we shot up nearly 200$.

Believe what you want, but that pump was pretty much solely based off Tether.

Downvote me plebs, but you all know it’s true 
But that’s just a conspiracy and the Whale Manpiulation meme that’s been tossed around for ages.

Tether printed, word spread, and we see an immediate 200$ BGD within 15 minutes of it being printed.

RSI/Macdad was showing we could definitely have a leg up, but we were in a stale mate between 8050-8100 for a few hours why didn’t we move up then? As soon as it printed it moved up? 
Time frames are arbitrary.  If you're investing based on past performance of your favorite time frames, best of luck to you.
That one i have it the same. 8450 now but should be between 8350 - 8400 when we get there (assuming no extra drop here)
Yep. It has something to do with this https://www.tradingview.com/x/s2STIXEu/
Remind me to keep posting this chart updated coming days. :)
I normally just tag people, but it's time to use the ignore feature.
I’m becoming skeptical and starting to believe passing 10k is science fiction. The market became to fragmented with coins that don’t make sense. 
I can't stop

Once i get the taste of blood....
Not falling for this artificial pump shit. These news pumps generally don’t last long. I expect a lot of shorts to be opening here 
There are three species of bears in North America. The most common is the American black bear (Ursus americanus). Black bears have killed only 61 people across North America since 1900. So they are relatively harmless. 
good question.  i initially thought it might be helpful to share what i learned, but the comments are making me question that.  So, was not looking for much, and the comments are actually making me think about a few things.  So, it's been interesting so far.  At the end of the day a large part of me that wishes this would crash down to the goblin town that is thrown around here the past 4 months so we can get it over with and be back on to the good stuff. Easy for me to wish that now as i watch from the sidelines.
interesting. i see that thrown around a lot on the board and i guess i just never really knew what it meant.
better way to look at it.
Woah, last sentence Sums it up perfectly  
She could have enjoyed her own short while desperately wishing she could have had a long.
Maybe he was afraid of a "premature accident" in this case.
I have never realized that the TA-jargon is so sexualized ... (Long, Short, BGD, BRD etc.) 
I agree... I would abandon my account 
thank you for the honest answer ;\) 
Does the chart involve squinting really hard or turning your head sideways? If so, plz disregard.
That can also be interpreted as a triangle.

Edit: a word
Looks more like a descending triangle to me, although that's usually a continuation pattern, and net effect is roughly the same. https://www.tradingview.com/x/io3mwlpE/
Over the past year (in my eyes) the main competitor of ETH, EOS, accumulated over 5% of all ETH in their ICO. What will happen if they dump it on the market, they could do it strategically once it goes live in June, it’s the reason I only hold 1 ETH now and more EOS.
I didn’t know ETH is leading BTC (according to people in this sub)  and I find it a bit frightening.
So short or just in fiat?
These are my sheets:

1. a short/long calculator that includes liquidation prices, potential gains/losess based on averaged take and potential stop loss, with RR ratio, display of all percentage differences between these points, accounts for fees.  It can take input to the entry price from another matrix that calculates an average price from multiple entries of various sizes, so that I can see how an order will effect the current position.  And another dedicated one of those matrixes just for doing averages calculations

2. a sheet for each coin that I trade/follow, with a date and price column.  Here I put news that could effect further decissions, or notes on "if this happens, then do that", because so often a day later I would have not done what I committed to.  OR, people start following the next thing and are blinded about the previous thing that is still in play

3.  A sheet tracking descending wedges, ascending wedges, bull flags, etc, for breakup / break down / mutation statistics that I traded off of.  (I stopped tracking this, but have found that I can count on clean descending wedges to play out properly more than anything else, though we broke down from one in the last day...(but it was not clean, had a shitty arbitrary support line, and a clean resistance line, which supports the theory actually))

4. A sheet of key BTC TA data.  Like what levels are the old horizontal support or resistance, and why and when.  And date points so I can redraw the historical log trend lines consistently.

5.  an actual log of trades for each coin.  I dont bother putting hte price here anymore, just raw losses gains.  I cluster these based on being "ahead" or "behind" and try to close out each block at break even or in profit before starting the next round.

6.  another sheet for dca laddering of day trades (I don't really do this anymore though).  like if I sold an alt, but it kept going up, so I sold again, and again, it tracks the average sell cost and amount (otherwise the btc mixes into the balances in binance), and another column helps me distribute buys back in the other direction.

7.  a sheet of strategies and tips from people here

8. a sheet of my own reminders of strategies and tips, but mostly in the form of warnings from failures

9.  a sheet of TA how to, like ichimoku parameters, how to properly draw a fib retrace, etc

That's just the trading workbook... there's another for the portfolio history...

you got an incorrect text from cryptowatch... i am an admin of cryptowatch... i want to look into why you got that text just now... i need your cryptowatch username to look it up in our logs
I see them more interested in making their own tokens and coins and maybe utilizing blockchain tech. Profiting off the volatility and making money from trading fees. But not actually interested in going long on bitcoin
They do have smart contracts, and there is no agency, not really.

Funds go into a 2of3 multisig. Third party is the arbitrator, and that is who the fees go to. They are only needed in case of a dispute.

They plan to go to a DAO like system eventually where fees are ultimately paid to all contributors of the project. It is still semi-centralized now but is still a young project like bitcoin in its early days.
I would go all-in on that
*mic drop*

had to log out to see who you were replying to since I already have this yahoo blocked LOL
That's about how I do it, although I do sometimes short more than my cold storage to be net short rather than boxed in and neutral.


I posted this yesterday. 

https://www.tradingview.com/x/J6wZVoPe/
It’s so strange how 8100 simply doesnt exist as resistance or support anymore. We are just meandering across that line like it means nothing.

8200 is the big one to watch. The BGC from this morning couldnt even get past 8180

No clue what to make of it.

Seems sensible to just hedge. If I had coins on Kraken/GDAX, I would sell for fiat
Traitor /u/chewtoy

/s
Me too.

https://www.tradingview.com/x/S5LjUal5/

I guess at this point, both views are valid and it just comes down to what actually ends up happening in the end :( .. Let's hope downwards :D
That's interesting. I didn't see it as a channel. On the kraken eur chart it looks more convincingly like a wedge. 

Given the potential for subjectivity, if a particular formation looks more convincing on other charts eg other exchanges or other fiat pairings, would you put more weight on that? Or just stick to the chart with the most trading volume?
pure gold
Pardon it didn't came across right. You are a great trader and I really want to know how you do it?
Seems like.
Sorry I don't know shit anyway , just wanted to share my useless opinion 
Seriously guys, wtf?!?

Trading and investing aren't guessing games, the ONLY thing that matters if you make money after drawing the line and chewy seems to be doing just that at this point. LTCM had an amazing win rate, how did that work out for them? The same way,  you can only get it right 1 out of 10 times but ride that wave so well that you more than make up for the 9 wrong calls.
I guess part of being a community leader is shitbirds with smaller brains than a solar powered calculator flocking at your stoop. apologies on behalf of the disrespecting goblin town carrions 
That this has to be explained...
I got stopped out of my short at basically break even. Not seeing the R/R here for opening a new short, but not confident this will go back up again.
!short xbtusd close 8160
My original long was going to scale in to 20% at 5x from 6600-5400 (spot) before bailing. I was already 80% short 5x from 7K in that circumstance, so I was willing to hold down close to liquidation before cutting it. 

I actually just closed this long. It had only scaled in to about 5% of the account at 7960 average (10x), and I closed it at 8080. I opened on swaps because I didn't expect to hold it very long and I didn't want to long sept futures with the premium that high in case it dropped below 7800. The premium would have moved heavily against me. It's looking like we're going to revisit 7960 sooner than later, so I figured I'd take profits. It wasn't a big position anyway.
From top to bottom I allocated about 50% at 5x, but only like a quarter of the orders filled. 

When we started breaking up in BGD I added half of the rest manually.

I believe that haser was using 25x though, so that he could keep more funds free for his other trades.  The dca continues to push the liquidation point away, but you should calculate the edge in advance so you don't get surprises.
Also, for the DCA, I do a cluster of many orders around each target supports zone, and put like 1~2% orders around, with a distance of a few dozen dollars in between.  Then skip the wasted space in between the support targets, that'll just ruin the dca if it goes lower.
Open your eyes.
5 simple reasons why the next 5 minutes are absolutely critical for Bitcoin's future. 

^^sponsored ^^content
With the gun 70% loaded
Here is the thing, in my opinion.

People who already have crypto are unlikely to drive the price up. It has to be outsiders that will bring new money to drive the price up. So I’d say that it’s more important how THEY view it.
Why not. But only if it drops and we don't get to see a BGC. Otherwise the chances are, (or lets just call it my gut feeling), that we might not even revisit $8,000-$8,100. 

Even if the price doesn't crosses $8,300, so long we sustain the price above $8,200, it should be good for buyers, long term investors, or in simpler terms, bulls!
Could be both scenarios 
Look good! Indeed, will re-evaluate if the market decides it wants to rocket off.

here's my chart/plan: https://www.tradingview.com/x/i3oGHPE1/
If ~$7800 was indeed destined to be our bottom, chances are the wick to $7910 is as close to that as we're ever going to get. It's either that, or $7800 is going to crash and burn and we'll go at least a few percent lower than that. The price never goes precisely to the level everyone is expecting, and there was definitely a lot of people expecting $7800 to be the turn around point, at least temporary. 
IT's pumping a bit harder than expected, and I reevaluated before moving up the target to 8350. It's still nicely on track for me :)

Chart: https://www.tradingview.com/x/3oQNv27u/
I speak more than 4 languages
Well, from my understanding: 1) They give you a notice you need to, but if you don't you can withdraw 2) Not all accounts are requested. In fact, they stated only accounts active up to 31st of december as they are dealing with 2017 tax year (that was in /r/bitfinex).

Just keep closing the account as soon as requested as they allow withdrawals. Then reopen until they open an account that they do not ask the info. Of course their policy could change, but my guess it was designed in this way to comply with a loophole as bitfinex always tries to create kyc loopholes.
Seriously, nothing seems natural these past few days. Also the whole mex thing yesterday, haha strange times. 
Yes this makes no sense.  I’m with you. Another shoot off to 8300 and I’m all out. I haven’t touched cold storage in so long but I think we are entering the watch money burn in your back yard phase right now. Not safe at all. 
Sure. I hope not but mehh. All the time in 8000's-9000's and falling back down makes that resistance stronger. We will see. I am longing until I see clear indicators on the daily and weekly of reversal.

Edit: Not "longing"
Yeah, my strategy to circumvent this issue has been to scale into big winners quickly. I try not to time the top or bottom perfectly with huge positions, I basically enter a small position at what I think is the top of bottom and then add *very* quickly once I'm in profit and it really starts to look toppy/bottomy.
If you play roulette at all, you probably don't have the mindset required for trading.

I really don't mean this as a dig, I just mean that you need to get into the mindset of always weighing up risk/reward and expected value.

It's very easy to calculate your expected value on roulette. You will lose approximately 5% of every dollar you wager on an American wheel, and around 3% of every dollar you wager on a European wheel. There is absolutely no way around this. No strategy will change the math.

I used to play poker professionally, but would sometimes gamble on negative expected value games like roulette for fun. My poker winrate went up noticeably after I eliminated all of mynon-poker -EV habits, and my standard deviation decreased significantly, just because of my change of mindset.

Make good r/r and +EV decisions a way of life, not just a trading mentality. It will help your trading immensely.


And then you'll be pissed when it dumps ;) 
It's fine gambling big if the risk/reward is worth it. If you would have put your entire stack on the line  before the profits why would you now? 

If you would, we'll that's a different story.. But don't justify it that "it's just profits." 

It's your money, your actual money now. Use it in the same way as if you had invested that much originally 
yea you can't really set stops anymore. kind of sucks. forces you to watch the charts.

I think if we go down to your entry again we are going down  much further, but if we don't then you should be fine just holding it for a while. you have a good one
underrated comment

I assume by moolah you mean bred
不会吧！ 
uhh, again, it isn't their Tether, it is their customers.  The customers deposit it to trade.  Those Tethers may be in Binance's custody, but it isn't "theirs".
In high-school when I was a gloried world of Warcraft player I typed 152 words a minute.

Our finger games are impeccable, the ladies must love you.. unless you’re sloppy 
>up to 170-200

proof or it didn't happen
Parent comment posted a position opening for the position bot. Bot command for the leverage is 10x if the trade is leveraged 10:1, 5x if leveraged 5:1, and so on. So in this context, 1x is the same as 1:1.
daily close above 8200 would be quite strong, but even above 8150 would give a nice closing candle on the daily, which might make us pop a little tomorrow. it would make a good case for tomorrow to grind to the top of the wedge, from which we'll have to see if we go further down or not. 
I'm prepared mentally to go down a lot more, but I'm keeping a close eye on a potential double bottom at 7900 as it would have a lot of similarities with our falling wedge from 11.7k, when we bounced from 7250, the only thing is the fib retrace was at 0.786 then, whilst now we've only touched the 0.618. 


We never reached the 7,700 support. Do you believe that if we drop we will still bounce from that level? At least to lower 8k levels...
Ah heh.  Yes, medium indeed!
He means Bart and Marge.
I spend plenty of mine too. That is mainly because it's free money and I've wound up with a large amount of it. 

That does not make us normal consumers. 
I've yet to see any of the people with a financial background pining for Amazon either. 

The most prominent sneerer at retail adoption is Wences Casares, a bloke with a long pedigree in conventional finance, who from minute one has regarded it as an irrelevance. 
So they made it harder to buy in those countries.  Big whoop.  Smart people will find ways around those problems.  And then there are decentralized exchanges coming down the road.  Government can slow down adoption, but they cannot stop it long term. 
Go look at the correlation in time. 

Tether printed at 18:20 UTC. Check out bitcoin price at 18:20 UTC..

https://www.coindesk.com/price/
Don’t tell me what to do. Have an updoot.
I mean, I don't understand why this is a big deal or makes it less "legitimate". It means a quarter billion of new money is potentially going to enter the market, why wouldn't we pump.
Wrong, again. Demand for 7.8k was greater than supply. You're all looking for external factors when it's all in the chart and indicators.
Downvoted for misspelling "plebes." 

So what will your excuse be next time it pumps?
Fingers crossed mate! :)
For those who care about money, ETH has grossly outperformed BTC.  For those who care about "supply algorithm", enjoy having less money but holding a coin that you think is prettier.
Okay that is beautiful. 
When I set that stop it was with the thought I might renter. We'll see how it goes. 

My long on Sept at least helps keep away the urges to revenge trade this or latch on to re-entering higher prematurely. 
How bout the grizzly 
I’m also partially on the sidelines, and I’m fine with goblin town or with moon station. Evaluating the market has very little to do with an individuals position, but rather to collude in seeing the current market state, and seeing if there’s opportunity to invest (be it long or short). 

There’s no correct answer to this, and that’s why there’s always conflicting opinions. Personally I think there’s more downside, despite having a significant portion of my stack in a long position. I just like hearing people’s opinions and perspectives because i know I’m limited in my perspective. 

I agree that dumping to goblin town and “getting it over with” would be grand, but that’s not how markets work. Well have to be patient and see whos goblin town we’ll reach, and what we’ll do after that 

Edit: I’m sorry if I don’t make sense
Curious why you changed your mind. Mind explaining in more detail?
nah it's definitely setting up to be one 
The shape is not that bad. I just dont know if the volume profile fits the pattern. 
Well it's not very exact but chart formations don't have to be that, the logic behind the pattern should apply. H&S is just a name for a trend reversal. Left shoulder topped at 705, head at 830, right shoulder at 746. Neckline at 630 ish. Higher high, higher high, lower high and possibly a lower low. There's your H&S pattern. It might become a huge H&S pattern if it keeps dropping, like sooo many other coins.
Well triangle or head and shoulders, if it breaks down the pain will be end game 
You are doing the safest thing mate, hold more EOS than ETH ;)
I'm in 100% fiat now, except for a few coins I mined.
Oh. You should've mentioned you're an admin. the text is correct just very late. I assumed it had to do with the texting service, not cryptowatch. It's my full name so I'd rather not post it here. How can I verify you're an admin? 
It is an ideal asset to manipulate, with no real fundamental value that can be calculated.

Plus there are enough trading volume that exchanges like Bitfinex and Binance and Bitmex are making tens of millions of $s in trading fees.  So if you can make those illegal somehow (or ban US residents from using them), then you can force everyone to your own exchanges and services and make them pay you instead.

But agreed, that there's no reason for them to go long BTC or ETH or anything else.  They want something they can control or where the entire system is built to be in their favor and crypto is too decentralized in that regard.


His tag is "epic douche".
This is the new normal it would appear.

The market started disregarding horizontal support/resistance sometime around the double-top at $11,700. 

When $9,200 fell, it should have established as strong resistance. Instead, the market flip-flopped above and below it on multiple occasions in the ensuing days. 

$8,200 was the same scenario yesterday. Once it fell, one would have expected the market to consolidate between $8,000 and $8,200 for awhile before moving down to test $7,800. Instead the market flip-flopped above and below a few times before finally making up its damn mind. 

I'm pretty much disregarding horizontal levels at the moment. Which is why I'm hopeful for the possibility of plowing straight through $7,800 instead of bouncing off it.
I chart on Bitstamp because it has the longest unbroken chain of historical data out of all the exchanges.

When there's significant disparity between formations on various exchanges, I generally defer to stamp.

Although the general consensus is that Bitfinex leads the market, so you might have more success charting that data.
I apologize as well. I did not have to be so snarky in my response.

As to how I do it, I honestly just guess. There's no secret to it, I'm just as in the dark for the most part as anybody else who's trying to wrap their head around the market. 

But technical analysis allows me to make educated guesses. When a trendline breaks, or a formation breaks, I'm guessing that the market will behave as I'd expect it to. And more often than not, it does. 

When a technical indicator suggests momentum is shifting, I guess that the market will behave as one would expect. And more often than not, it does.

More importantly, I'm exceptional at managing risk. When I'm wrong, I'm able to detach myself emotionally from being wrong and just suck it up and take my loss. A lot of traders struggle with that. 
Don't be sorry. I'm not upset or annoyed by your question, and it's a perfectly valid one. 

For the most part, nobody looks at my entire trading history (aside from myself). So it's easy to see me make a few bad calls in a row and think, "something's off...this isn't his normal trading pattern." 

In reality though, I do this kind of shit all the time. I make wrong moves constantly. It's just that, when I make them, they're smaller than my right moves.

This approach isn't for everybody. But it's been working for me for awhile now.
People don't love to see David win. They love to see Goliath lose. 

My losing trades are confirmation that I have no idea what I'm talking about. My winning trades are just lucky guesses. 

It's funny, because I'll be the first to admit that I really don't know where the market is headed at any given time. When I enter a position, I'm always guessing. But I'm guessing with the best information I have available.

I'm not sure where why so many people insist that I claim otherwise. 
This post has a lot of avian flavor. 
Position closed with success



* Position: short xbtusd

* Opening value: 8,180.00

* Average value: 8,200.00

* Closing value: 8,160.00

* Leverage: 10.00X

* Stack: 100.00%

* PnL: 0.24%

[Check Open Positions](https://www.anotherbot.info/)


I agree to an extent. You're just forgetting one thing: people who hold it get impatient. the people who bought since September are not patient people. that's why they bought an asset that was doing 10% a week despite that being financially reckless. 

These are the people in control of downwards movement. They will cash out when the new money doesn't flow in because they're bored/tired of seeing their investment tank. Buy high, sell low. 

They have no effect on upwards movement because they're primarily already all bought in. But they can tank the price...and they will once they get bored/impatient

That's why I'm bearish 
[deleted]
That's be a decent bounce, if it happens. What if we're in a [descending channel](https://imgur.com/a/QekcqA9), not a falling wedge? If drawn on trend lines instead of price, might look like a channel. April 12 BGD drawn the same way is clearly a wedge.
I agree with this assessment. Last night, I was considering placing a long at around 7900 before going to bed, but I had decided to cool off from a few hectic days to not let the frustration cloud my judgment. I'm watching from the sidelines now.
Nice charting. We should be hitting the upper wedge limit in the next 2-3 hours. I have scaled limit buys starting from 7700s and down. Let's see what happens. Good luck!
wo wohnst du regulär in D?
> I hope not but mehh.

lol, are you in any position currently?
You've given me similar advice in the past and it was very helpful!


Interesting.  I was doing an opposite strategy (assuming longs) where I would put a smaller buy when I think it was "time" then if it goes up, let it do it's thing until I hit my profit target, but if it went down DCA into a larger position.  I'm finding this works until it doesn't.

I think mostly the issue is I need to get out of my own way and take the L on a trade when it goes past my planned threshold.

Today is a new day.
I know this is how one should think of it, but I just downright dont care. I yolo the fuck out of my profits all the time :)
I think you’re right it just depends on if we stay held down. At this point we may dip to 7800 and then jet back up to 8200 in 5 min. Anyway have a good night and happy trading!
Maybe.
对，中国人不要买bitcorn
Wow that's actually really fast. it's rare I meet .
someone who can type 140+ for any extended period of time. You realize we're in like the top 0.5% of all typers in the world right? 

🤓🤓
fight me on typeracer.com! 

I can set a record and show you later, I'll make the name sloppy and place in the top 10 of the hour or day or something  

I know it sounds really unlikely but I am an extremely fast typer! People will look at me and laugh when I type because they think I'm joking around just slapping keys at first. and then they see I'm actually typing

I play the piano/drums too so that's part of it 
Yeah I made a mistake 1:1 is 1x but you are still borrowing one-to-one so your position size is still 20k on a 10k 1x. 0x means you haven't borrowed anything.
Thanks mate, that is a lot of valuable information. I am looking at all possible scenarios that could be favorable in terms of my position. :)

As we speak, looks like the battle has started lol. Happy trading!
I'm not expecting anything V-shaped bounce-wise. But rather a rounded bottom. Could be in the upper 7's, though I'm expecting middle to lower 7's then a steady climb over the summer. 
Haha, aaaaah that makes sense. Yes, we should just stick with the simpsons terminology 
i’ve spoken to a couple growth fund managers. consensus is still bullish on amazon for them.  more about what they can do rather than what they’ve become.  

one of them told me that the stock price will soon reach its inflection point before going parabolic... i’m like really?  
> So they made it harder to buy in those countries.

No, they effectively banned it.  They stopped it, for all practical purposes.

But yes you are correct that they cannot 100% erase the word "Bitcoin" from human consciousness.  So Bitcoin "wins"...congratulations, and I'm congratulating myself on my short position as well.
Yup. Literally pumped at the exact same time it was printed. 
UpToot 

*fart*
Or can be used to short. Irrelevant, speculative.
Stop talking sense. These guys believe in magic lines drawn between arbitrary points on charts, not the indisputable math of supply and demand.
thanks. macro-consolidation process ending is beautiful indeed. 
A black bear's first line of defence is retreat, but grizzlies, especially sows with cubs, can be very aggressive towards other bears and people they perceive as threats. Grizzlies are not good tree climbers, though it's important to note that they can climb trees. 
I think a lot of the comments about lack of use cases really resonate with me.  It concerns me that other than a currency (which has its challenges) it has been tough for me to understand exactly what the use cases will look like for bitcoin.  I have read a lot and questioned on other boards, but i have never had a use case (other than a currency) outlined in terms that i can understand.  So, that concerns me and helps me identify with bearish scenarios.  
Easy - the last sentence probably hit the nail on the head. Clearly i see a bearish scenario in my head which is why i sold and fear of losing capital. But i have become even more bearish over the past couple of days and even did the flair thing.

I am bored and frustrated that i have lost paper gains and i refuse to lose any more so i got out. Now its easy for me to be a bear and a lot of the bear arguments resonate more with me now. But, your last comment and couple below (confirmation bias) help me understand how one can flip thinking quickly.

Any how, love all you guys/gals. Give me that dip i need and let's get bitcoin back on track.
Well, I shorted the eth/btc ratio on mex for shiggles this morning. 
just email it to admin@cryptowat.ch. i want to make sure it wasnt on our end. thanks!
To argue the counterpart?

Where you gonna bail on that short? 8300+

8200 may not prove to be any resistance, though I doubt it
Why do you want it to plow through $7,800?
It's all good man. :)

Your trading style is great and you make much better educated and calculated guesses than most of the people here.

Also, Your risk management is good. As you said, you do not hesitate to pull the plug when you feel the need. Many people never do it and, let alone the realization that they are wrong.

Anyhow, I like following your posts. Your short from $9,150 was bingo! :) 

Thanks u/haserfauld for initially trying to clarify it on my behalf, you were right, I wasn't trying to be a D, I feel bad that it didn't come across right. :)

I pray all of us make a lot of money in future. Cheers!
thanks for explaining and your posts , greatly appreciated!
Hey Chewy,  let me start off by saying I’ve been trying to learn from you because I do believe you are a profitable trader.

I’ve only been following your moves for a few months.  And I guess I started following right at the beginning of a hot streak for you.  It seemed you were making around 3 trades per week and profitably on 2/3 of those.  And often HIGHLY profitable.  

Then for the past week, you’ve been making more like 3 trades per day, and have been break even or small loss or small gain, except for one sizeable loss.  

Do you think the difference in your trading frequency from the past 3 months versus the past week is the result of market indecision, which results in more direction changes and therefore more trades, or do you think you are using a different strategy in the past week?

An example, your long from 7950.  Based on how I’ve been following your moves, I would have expected you to hold it for a while since it was in profit.  Previously when I saw you get in on a short term move that breaks the way you were predicting, like you did here, and end up in modest profits, you would move shorts to break even and ride it.  Why did you choose not to do that this time from 7950? 


This makes me sad. Come on Sloppy it's going to be ok. 

Na, I get why you say that.  I just don't think people will get bored and sell. They will keep it rain or shine.
It’s a good point, but then again, those who came into crypto a while ago and had made 1000000% ROI, might be those who will always buy it from them when it’s low, just to sell high to those same people and a few newcomers, and repeat it many times over. 

Well, it’s speculation now and as I said in reality I have no idea what’s going to happen in the long run. Just my thoughts.
I am also seeing the ladder formation, getting lower each time. 

But as of now, I don' think there's more sell pressure left in the market for us to see a BRC. 


ich wohne inna schweiz. Bin aber oft am Wochenende in DLand
No I'm not. Been killed in this, down 42% trying to go against trend. No more. Have a little underwater from 8400. I'll wait until Super Guppy turns fully to the upside down the road.
lol I mean it's fun to do it. But I personally try to do less gambling and do more of making long term money that I won't lose in one trade.

The question we should ask ourselves is: how many times can I make this trade before statistically, I go broke? will it eventually be worth it? 


yes sorry, I thought it would hold up here a bit better. If we go back down before breaching $8100 convincingly then yea probably worth it to hold. but if we go higher like $8200-8300+ and back down then it probably planking
啊

中国人就喜欢买很贵的东西

有可能bitcoin还没那么贵
It may be that I’m 6’1 and have the hands of a 12 year old girl, I rarely fat finger anything.

Let me get some practice in and I’ll type race you. It’s been a while since I’ve stepped on stage 
Okay, I'm waiting to see that

I'll try it too but i didn't say I would break the global 10 top list, you did lol

edit. I just did it and got 102 :/
Yeah honestly, this can really go either way still, r/r still doesn't really favour a long from here I think, but it's getting better every day and price is holding up better then I expected. We'll probably have a much clearer image by Monday, so for now enjoying the weekend is priority #1 ;) Good luck! 
Yeah if we see another V again it's going to be a *lot* lower than that.  People are already comfortable enough with the idea of a 7k price.

I also foresee mostly tedious attrition battles unless we approach a new extreme.
Am talking of Amazon taking Bitcoin and retail in general. I've zero thoughts about Amazon stock. Good luck to it regardless. 
Even in countries run by an iron fist like communist China, there are ways to circumvent unjust laws:

[https://www.24hchina.com/buy\-bitcoins\-in\-china/](https://www.24hchina.com/buy-bitcoins-in-china/)

Bitcoin cannot be stopped, because deep down, all people wish to be free.  Bitcoin can deliver that \(in a monetary sense\).
Maybe they are bots who are watching tether printing and act e.g close shorts/Go Long 
So correlation is causation now.  OK.
Do you mind explaining your chart a bit? From what I can tell it looks like a number of different moving averages coming together. 
I bet I can outclimb the grizzly. Thanks for the fun facts!
I completely agree, I also have adoption concerns. And to be fair I’m not sure if that is problematic or not, I’ve read contrary points of view and they both make sense. 8k for something that is barely used, it’s a hard sell, but a lot of it Is trading/speculative value, plus the fact that it’s something without any underlying value, which blurs all attempt at putting an attempt on putting and accurate value on it. A lot of it is also faith that the technology will take off, and that’s an individuals choice whether or not they see it having an actual use case in the future. There no real answer there, just speculation. You either decide to hop on at a certain value, or you wait to the price level at which you’re willing to take the risk that is has value.

Edit: https://nakamotoinstitute.org/mempool/im-hoarding-bitcoins-and-no-you-cant-have-any/

This is an interesting read, nothing to live by, but and interesting perspective.
Probably
Because I'm short at the moment. 

I don't have as strong an emotional attachment to bitcoin as a lot of folks here. 

As long as I'm on the right side of the move, I don't especially care if the market pumps to $15K or drops to $1000 from current levels.
When bitcoin is trending heavily in one direction, I tend to perform better and trade less frequently. 

When bitcoin is chopping around, I tend to trade more frequently and perform more poorly. 

My single greatest shortcoming as a trader is that I absolutely suck at distinguishing between the two states. However, it also ensures I rarely miss out on significant movements. This is because I'm treating every entry like it's going to yield a 5% to 10% return...even if the best case scenario is more realistically a 2% scalp.

The result is that I take a lot of small losses, and a few large gains. Over time it's a profitable strategy. 

I could minimize the losses by staying out of the market during periods of chop, but I'd also minimize my gains as well. Because I'd increase the likelihood that I'd be out of position during strong moves.

Throughout the past year, I've probably spent less than 200 hours out of position. 
nope.  source - ME
I don't believe so tbh, I see quite a few people cashing out over the past few months. When institutional money fails to pour in I believe the bubble will go through another popping. $8k is still an exorbitant price rn 
> Have a little underwater from 8400.

Guess you are not alone. Welcome to the party. :D 

And yeah, observe the trend and go with it, not the other way. Cheers.
As soon as I use up all my profits, I only buy heavy heavy oversold dips
中国人喜欢赌博，但政府不喜欢。 

Edit: not gonna lie, had to look up some words again 😭 mandarin is leaving meee
I'm down man. Wait you have small fingers? lol 


Oh yeah, I was just wondering what should I be doing tonight haha. ;)   Thanks and you too. 
Please try to pay attention.  I never said it can be 100% stopped.  That would mean that not one person on the planet would be able to buy or sell or transfer BTC.

You clearly want to live in your fantasy world and I realize it is cruel of me to tell you that your "God" does not exist.  It's probably all you have, so I won't say anything more.
If only bitcoin could outclimb the bears.... 
Don't you care about your total fiat value staying constant or decreasing (if you miss the right side of the move)?
But when you are long and right, you gain BTC and Fiat.  When you are short and right, you only gain fiat.  So wouldn’t you prefer an increase in price, if you are going to be on the right side either way?  
Yeah. Because the lack of institutional investors really stunted growth in the past...
Right ;)
Can we bet on this? also heck ya on the drums piano thing. I’m an organist drummer myself. 
What’s your email I’ll send you some hand pics 
Yes, that's always a concern, and it's why I short in the first place. I'm never gaining fiat value when I short. I'm only maintaining the existing fiat value of my cold storage. 
I'd actually prefer a decline, as it would allow me to accumulate more BTC. Which is always my ultimate goal. 

It's not like bitcoin would drop to $1,000 and I'd immediately close my short and sell everything I have. 

The ideal scenario is a drop as far as possible followed by another extended bull run above $20K. The longer it takes, the better. 
Institutional investors have largely steered clear of bitcoin 
I guess that makes sense as long as you believe  recovery is pretty much a certainty
That’s my point. They’ve steered clear, and how much of a difference has that made?
 the entire space has bubbled up on the *promise* of institutional money. When the dumb money realizes any small amount of smart money there was left, the dumb money begins to leave, too. 

The expectation that institutional money will carry this to exorbitant heights will crumple under its own weight and the misconception that drove bitcoin to ridiculous prices will decouple with reality. 

People will slowly realize that institutional money is a euphoria meme and the space is just full of dumb money trying to get rich quick. 

Look at what happened right before and after futures. 

When the market realized futures were a total non-event, expectations exceeded reality and the price tanked. That's how all bubbles occur and pop- it's a glimpse into what the future of all crypto will look like. 

There's only so many idiots that will buy in. If you go back a few years, the average crypto investor was leaps and bounds smarter than the average one now. 

Eventually there's no dumb money left, institutional money will continue to stay out, and all the smart money dumps their bags on greedy fools. No more moon

Look around, r/cryptocurrency, r/bitcoin, r/ethtrader, and ask yourself: "have these guys really figured it out? Is this it? We're ALL going to be rich if we just hold?"

I mean really. Seriously ask yourself...when has anything in life that sounds too good to be true come true for the average Joe?

Just seems blatantly obvious to me.
Jesus Dude. Take a break from trading and Reddit. Sounds like you’re having a manic episode. 
lol wut. 

what about that even seems manic? are you just upset because it makes you uncomfortable?

do you *really* think all the retards on /r/cryptocurrency have struck gold and are going to get rich? seriously just look at all them, they're a bunch of morons. minimal life experience will tell you these people are massive suckers and will hold bags til the bottom. there's a reason the SEC had a to make a fake ICO page to warn people about how stupid they're acting

everyone on /r/cryptocurrency is a complete moron
